Ohio, session 136, SB371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 201.10. Except as otherwise provided in this act, all appropriation items in this act are appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund that are not otherwise appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2028. Section 353.10. 1 2 3 A ADJ ADJUTANT GENERAL B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C74528 Camp Perry Improvements $750,000 E C74535 Renovations and Improvements $2,000,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,750,000 G Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) H C74537 Renovation Projects - Federal Share $11,000,000 I C74539 Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements - Federal $10,000,000 J Army National Guard Service Contract Fund (Fund 3420) Total $21,000,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $23,750,000 Section 353.15. ARMY NATIONAL GUARD RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS - FEDERAL The foregoing appropriation item C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal, shall be used to fund capital projects that are coded as receiving one hundred percent federal support. Notwithstanding section 131.35 of the Revised Code, if after the effective date of this section, additional federal funds are made available to the Adjutant General to carry out one hundred percent federally supported projects, the Adjutant General may request that the Director of Budget and Management authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated to appropriation item C74539, Army National Guard Renovations and Improvements – Federal. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C74535, Renovations and Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C74535, Renovations and Improvements, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C74541, Armory Technology Infrastructure. Section 355.10. 1 2 3 A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C05517 General Building Renovations $563,578 E C05542 BCI Laboratory Equipment $5,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $568,578 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $568,578 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C05517, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05517, General Building Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05537, Richfield Facility Renovations. BCI LABORATORY EQUIPMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C05542, BCI Laboratory Equipment, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C05542, BCI Laboratory Equipment, plus up to $134,341. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Attorney General shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $36,213 from appropriation item C05502, Bowling Green Facility, $12,525 from appropriation item C05521, BCI London Renovations, $9,113 from appropriation item C05523, Security Improvements, $39,681 from appropriation item C05525, Richfield HVAC, $13,595 from appropriation item C05529, OPOTA Tactical Training Center Highway Response Course Renovation, and $23,214 from appropriation item C05535, TTC Outdoor Gun Range. Section 357.01. DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION 1 2 3 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C23501 Supercomputer Center Expansion $114,131 E C23530 Technology Initiatives $1,043,620 F C23551 Ohio Innovation Exchange $400,000 G C23560 HEI Critical Maintenance and Upgrades $2,820,723 H C23563 Ohio Cyber Range $227,256 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,605,730 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C23568 OARnet - Taxable $9,249,829 L C23569 Research Facility Action and Investment Funds - Taxable $2,355,714 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $11,605,543 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $16,211,273 RESEARCH FACILITY ACTION AND INVESTMENT FUNDS - TAXABLE The foregoing appropriation item C23569, Research Facility Action and Investment Funds - Taxable, shall be used for a grant program to be administered by the Chancellor of Higher Education to provide timely availability of capital facilities for research programs and research-oriented instructional programs at or involving state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education. Section 357.02. 1 2 3 A BTC BELMONT TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36800 Basic Renovations $957,768 E C36806 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $5,310 F C36810 Handicap Parking and Parking Improvement for Barr Community Building $125,000 G C36812 Campus Safety Grant Program $29,180 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,117,258 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C36807 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $166,427 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $166,427 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,283,685 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36800, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36800, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36809, Industrial Trades Center. Section 357.03. 1 2 3 A BGU BOWLING GREEN STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C24000 Basic Renovations $24,222 E C24035 Library Depository Northwest $294,613 F C24059 Technology Building Renovation $50,038 G C24068 Advanced Manufacturing, Engineering, and Applied Science Corridor $573,966 H C24069 BGSU Water Quality Research and Education Center $8,967 I C24073 Mercy College of Ohio Physician Assistant Program $125,000 J C24075 Campus Safety Grant Program $66,660 K C24076 Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Mechanical, Electrical, and Plumbing $331,639 L C24078 Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences $1,486,336 M C24079 Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Technology - Wired Network $4,000,000 N C24080 Academic Building Infrastructure and Space Rehabilitation - Firelands $697,950 O C24084 Academic Building Rehabilitation $2,839,967 P Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $10,499,358 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $10,499,358 ACADEMIC BUILDING REHABILITATION - APPLIED SCIENCES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C24078, Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24078, Academic Building Rehabilitation - Applied Sciences, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C24077, Critical Infrastructure Rehabilitation - Roofing and Building Envelope. Section 357.04. 1 2 3 A COT CENTRAL OHIO TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36928 Campus Safety Grant Program $220,500 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $220,500 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $220,500 Section 357.05. 1 2 3 A CSU CENTRAL STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C25515 Information Technology Network and Infrastructure $800,000 E C25538 Sewer Line and Water Tower Maintenance and Rehabilitation $750,000 F C25541 Dayton Dream Center Transitional Housing $125,000 G C25542 East End Whole Family Services Hub Facility Expansion and Renovation in Dayton $125,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,800,000 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C25531 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $195,000 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $195,000 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,995,000 Section 357.06. 1 2 3 A CTC CINCINNATI STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36134 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $9,162 E C36136 Energy Efficiency and Savings Projects $265,995 F C36139 Hamilton County Agricultural Facility Improvements $50,000 G C36140 Main Building Renovations $2,837,489 H C36141 IT System Upgrades $759,971 I C36144 The Building Blocks Of History $25,000 J C36146 Campus Safety Grant Program $226,040 K C36149 La Soupe Basement Expansion $150,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,323,657 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C36145 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $13,520 O C36147 Center for Workforce Innovation - Taxable $372,696 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $386,216 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $4,709,873 WORKFORCE BASED TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36134, Workforce Based Training and Equipment, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36134, Workforce Based Training and Equipment, plus up to $12,702. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cincinnati State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $12,702 from appropriation item C36137, Greater Cincinnati Manufacturing Careers Accelerator Additive Design and Materials Testing Innovations. MAIN BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36140, Main Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36140, Main Building Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36137, Greater Cincinnati Manufacturing Careers Accelerator Additive Design and Materials Testing Innovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36111, Roof Replacement, plus up to $55,271. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cincinnati State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $9,257 from appropriation item C36124, STEM Laboratory Renovations, $36,827 from appropriation item C36127, Center for Workforce Innovation and Education, and $9,187 from appropriation item C36135, Student Completion and Career Service One-Stop Center. Section 357.07. 1 2 3 A CLT CLARK STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38526 Safety and Security Upgrades $5,655 E C38527 Rhodes Hall and Applied Science Center Renovation $3,718,031 F C38529 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $8,874 G C38532 Clark State Performing Arts Center $160,525 H C38534 Community Health Partners Musculoskeletal Institute Center of Excellence $125,000 I C38535 Campus Safety Grant Program $112,554 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $4,130,639 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C38533 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $17,363 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $17,363 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $4,148,002 Section 357.08. 1 2 3 A CLS CLEVELAND STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C26000 Basic Renovations $300,445 E C26098 MetroHealth Senior Health and Wellness Center $450,000 F C260A1 United Way of Greater Cleveland Building Renovations $150,000 G C260A2 Kenmore Commons Improvements $150,000 H C260A3 Goodwill Industries Training Center $50,000 I C260A5 Campus Safety Grant Program $323,177 J C260A8 Mechanical, Electrical, Plumbing Improvements $3,000,000 K C260B1 Life Safety, IT, and Security Projects $1,169,036 L C260B6 Fenn Hall Façade and Labs $15,000,000 M Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $20,592,658 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $20,592,658 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C26000, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26000, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26022, Campus Fire Alarm Upgrade, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26065, Main Classroom Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26079, Rhodes Tower Restroom Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26082, Campus-Wide Elevator Modifications, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26084, IT Security Upgrade and Data Center Restructuring, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C26096, Rhodes Tower Renewal Phase I, plus up to $750,213. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cleveland State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $219,111 from appropriation item C26094, Anatomy Laboratory Renovation, $209,571 from appropriation item C26095, Music and Communications Building Roof Replacement, and $321,531 from appropriation item C26096, Rhodes Tower Renewal Phase I. Section 357.09. 1 2 3 A CTI COLUMBUS STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38420 Technology Upgrades $48,507 E C38425 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $12,123 F C38428 Business Technologies School $30,008 G C38435 Student Success Renovations $15,000,000 H C38436 Building Repairs $205,850 I C38437 Building Infrastructure Repairs $9,000,000 J C38439 Academic/Student Space Upgrades $119,164 K C38440 Delaware Entrepreneurial Center Ohio Wesleyan $12,182 L C38453 Campus Safety Grant Program $27,835 M C38455 Girl Scouts of Ohio's Heartland STEM and Leadership Immersion Campus $1,500,000 N C38459 Van Buren Center Essential Renovation $500,000 O C38462 CRIS Facilities $40,000 P Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,495,669 Q Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) R C38451 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $39,203 S C38463 Gravity Project Phase 2 - Taxable $575,000 T C38464 Rickenbacker Area Mobility Center - Taxable $1,000,000 U C38467 Jewish Family Services Technology Hub for Workforce Advancement - Taxable $125,000 V Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,739,203 W TOTAL ALL FUNDS $28,234,872 STUDENT SUCCESS RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations, plus up to $5,000. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,000 from appropriation item C38435, Student Success Renovations. BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE REPAIRS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs, plus up to $266,958. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Columbus State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $266,958 from appropriation item C38437, Building Infrastructure Repairs. Section 357.10. 1 2 3 A CCC CUYAHOGA COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37800 Basic Renovations $4,500,000 E C37853 CWRU Dental Clinic Relocation $200,000 F C37862 Cleveland Institute of Art Interactive Media Lab $150,000 G C37867 The Lyric Center $75,000 H C37869 Shoes and Clothes for Kids $175,000 I C37871 The Cleveland Institute of Art $550,000 J C37876 Wayfinding Signage Upgrades $1,500,000 K C37877 Replace Campus Security Servers $202,592 L C37879 Corporate College Renovations $336,452 M C37880 American Cancer Society's Cleveland Hope Lodge Renovation $50,000 N Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $7,739,044 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) P C37865 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $71,713 Q C37881 Construction Based Trades Academy - Taxable $200,000 R C37882 Medina Christian Academy Capital Expansion - Taxable $300,000 S Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $571,713 T TOTAL ALL FUNDS $8,310,757 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations, plus up to $402,953. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Cuyahoga Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $402,953 from appropriation item C37800, Basic Renovations. Section 357.12. 1 2 3 A ESC EDISON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C39000 Basic Renovations $104,900 E C39018 HVAC Repair and Replacements $58,040 F C39029 Campus Safety Grant Program $27,348 G C39032 Classroom and Lab Renovations $52,292 H C39033 Edison State Engineering Lab and Classroom Renovation $500,000 I C39034 Edison State Nursing Wing Renovation $500,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,242,580 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C39025 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $46,476 M C39030 Basic Renovations - Taxable $7,615 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $54,091 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,296,671 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C39019, Parking Lot Resurfacing, plus up to $6,900. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Edison State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,900 from appropriation item C39000, Basic Renovations. Section 357.13. 1 2 3 A HTC HOCKING TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36300 Basic Renovations $927,574 E C36328 McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation $767,086 F C36334 Hocking Aquaculture Project $117,945 G C36336 Campus Safety Grant Program $125,858 H C36337 Firing Range and Classroom Renovations $150,000 I C36346 Fairfield County CDL Training and Testing Lot $300,000 J C36347 Hocking College Advanced Manufacturing Lab $200,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,588,463 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C36335 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $182,764 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $182,764 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,771,227 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36300, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36300, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36323, Equestrian and Veterinary Workforce Facilities Renovation, plus up to $39,398. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Hocking Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $39,398 from appropriation item C36334, Hocking Aquaculture Project. MCCLENAGHAN CENTER FOR CULINARY HOSPITALITY - RENOVATION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36328, McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36328, McClenaghan Center for Culinary Hospitality - Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36327, Public Safety and Natural Resources Program Laboratory Renovation and Expansion. Section 357.14. 1 2 3 A LTC JAMES RHODES STATE COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38100 Basic Renovations $1,746,485 E C38116 Center for Health Science Education and Innovation $128,978 F C38122 Campus Safety Upgrades $103,239 G C38126 Campus Safety Grant Program $199,365 H C38128 Parking Lot Improvements $53,074 I C38129 Technology Infrastructure Upgrades $958,142 J C38130 Classroom and Lab Space Renovations $28,449 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,217,732 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C38125 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $239,798 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $239,798 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,457,530 Section 357.15. 1 2 3 A KSU KENT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27079 Blossom Music Center $3,800,000 E C270F3 Severance Hall $3,850,000 F C270H2 Founders Hall HVAC Upgrades - Tuscarawas $163,098 G C270I5 White Hall Rehabilitation - Kent $561,261 H C270K3 Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent $1,604,183 I C270K4 Campus ADA Improvements - Kent $272,993 J C270K7 Nursing Skills Lab Renovation - Geauga $83,672 K C270K9 Rockwell Hall Renovation and Expansion - Kent $45,000 L C270L5 Garfield Zimmerman Home $250,000 M C270L8 Blossom Music Center Improvements $2,400,000 N C270M1 Severance Hall $800,000 O C270M4 Campus Safety Grant Program $500,000 P C270M9 Library - Theater Building Roof Replacement - Trumbull $90,259 Q C270N1 Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem $196,098 R C270N2 IT Network Access Enhancement in Academic Buildings - Kent $1,260,506 S C270N4 East Liverpool Athletic Center $200,000 T C270N5 Severance Music Center $500,000 U C270O3 Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool $300,000 V C270O5 University Library Tower Renovations and Elevator Modernization - Kent $4,500,000 W C270O6 Elevator Modernizations for Accessibility - Kent $3,000,000 X C270O7 Central Chiller Plant Replacement - Stark $652,392 Y C270O9 Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula $163,098 Z C270P5 Blossom Music Center $1,050,000 AA C270P6 Porthouse Theater Improvements $147,300 AB Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $26,389,860 AC Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AD C270H6 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $277,147 AE C270O4 Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool - Taxable $8,664 AF C270P3 Cunningham Hall Deferred Maintenance Phase II - Kent - Taxable $80,712 AG C270P7 Ashland County Airport Authority Terminal and Flight School Project - Taxable $150,000 AH C270P8 TRAM Innovation Center - Taxable $800,000 AI Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,316,523 AJ TOTAL ALL FUNDS $27,706,383 CRITICAL DEFERRED MAINTENANCE - KENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K3, Critical Deferred Maintenance - Kent, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270G3, Fire Alarm System Replacements, plus up to $5,106. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Kent State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,106 from appropriation item C270I4, Henderson Hall HVAC and ADA Improvements. MAIN CLASSROOM ROOFTOP UNIT REPLACEMENT PHASE I - SALEM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270N1, Main Classroom Rooftop Unit Replacement Phase I - Salem, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270K6, Classroom 127 Renovation/Electrical System Upgrades - Salem. PURINTON HALL RENOVATIONS - EAST LIVERPOOL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O3, Purinton Hall Renovations - East Liverpool, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27003, Classroom Building Renovations - East Liverpool. MAIN HALL ENTRANCE RENOVATION - ASHTABULA The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270O9, Main Hall Entrance Renovation - Ashtabula, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C270I7, Library Asbestos Abatement and Restroom Installation - Ashtabula. Section 357.16. 1 2 3 A LCC LAKELAND COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37900 Basic Renovations $447,217 E C37928 Campus Safety Grant Program $197,741 F C37935 Mechanic Infrastructure Replacement $693,537 G C37936 Electric Infrastructure Replacement $88,925 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,427,420 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C37927 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $164,157 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $164,157 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,591,577 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37900, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37919, Engineering Building Renovations. Section 357.17. 1 2 3 A LOR LORAIN COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38333 Campus Safety Grant Program $6,482 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $6,482 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,482 Section 357.18. 1 2 3 A MTC MARION TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35916 Bryson Hall Renovations $852,456 E C35921 Campus Safety Grant Program $118,000 F C35922 Library Classroom Building Renovations $511,455 G C35923 Bryson Hall Renovations $1,150,000 H C35924 Engineering Classroom and Lab Renovations at Marion Technical College $100,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,731,911 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,731,911 BRYSON HALL RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C35923, Bryson Hall Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C35923, Bryson Hall Renovations, plus up to $30,739. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Marion Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,781 from appropriation item C35912, Bryson Hall Renovations, and $24,958 from appropriation item C35916, Bryson Hall Renovations. Section 357.19. 1 2 3 A MUN MIAMI UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C28502 Basic Renovations - Hamilton $42,088 E C28503 Basic Renovations - Middletown $24,871 F C28505 Cooperative Regional Library Depository Southwest $261,822 G C28527 Campus Safety Grant Program $108,260 H C28528 Bachelor Hall Renovation $223,119 I C28591 Butler Tech Manufacturing Center $200,000 J C28592 Middletown Regional Airport Aviation Workforce Training Center $750,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,610,160 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C28599 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $481,043 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $481,043 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,091,203 Section 357.20. 1 2 3 A NCC NORTH CENTRAL TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38000 Basic Renovations $132,356 E C38010 Kehoe Center Infrastructure Renovation $122,389 F C38014 IT Data Infrastructure Upgrade Project $32,930 G C38031 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $183,000 H C38032 Campus Safety Grant Program $79,806 I C38034 Security Card Access System $325,000 J C38035 Parking Lot Renovations $345,500 K C38036 Fallerius Center Chiller and Switchgear Renovations $750,000 L C38037 Child Development Center Renovations $589,187 M Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,560,168 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) O C38028 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $269,863 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $269,863 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,830,031 Section 357.21. 1 2 3 A NEM NORTHEAST OHIO MEDICAL UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C30500 Basic Renovations $104,257 E C30501 Cooperative Regional Library Depository Northeast $77,597 F C30547 Mercy Medical OBGYN Emergency Department $90,000 G C30553 Mansfield Regional Behavioral Center $400,000 H C30554 Cleveland Clinic Mercy Hospital Cancer Center $500,000 I C30555 Akron Children's Rehabilitation Services $150,000 J C30562 NEOMED Chiller Plant Upgrades $1,000,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,321,854 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C30563 Hall of Fame Village Center for Excellence - Taxable $1,000,000 N Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,000,000 O TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,321,854 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30500, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30500, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30542, Distributed Antenna System and Enhanced Video Security Surveillance System, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30551, Building D Roof Replacement. Section 357.22. 1 2 3 A NTC NORTHWEST STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38200 Basic Renovations $75,929 E C38219 Building B Renovations $32,000 F C38222 Northwest State Community College Cyber Disaster Recovery Site $7,839 G C38223 Campus Safety Grant Program $268,398 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $384,166 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C38211 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $161,671 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $161,671 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $545,837 WORKFORCE BASED TRAINING AND EQUIPMENT - TAXABLE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable, plus up to $47,963. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Northwest State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $47,963 from appropriation item C38211, Workforce Based Training and Equipment – Taxable. Section 357.23. 1 2 3 A OSU OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C315AZ Neuromodulation Clinical Expansion $395,266 E C315BR Replacement Emergency Generators $3,000,000 F C315D2 Supercomputer Center Expansion $5,000 G C315DE Ohio Library and Information Network $5,000 H C315DM Roof Repair and Replacements $10,000,000 I C315DN Fire System Replacements $5,000,000 J C315DP HVAC Repair and Replacements $6,500,000 K C315DQ Elevator Safety Repairs and Replacements $8,000,000 L C315DR Infrastructure Improvements $1,970,046 M C315DS Building Envelope Repair $6,000,000 N C315DT Plumbing Repair $3,615,815 O C315DU Road and Bridge Improvements $162,737 P C315ET Research Portal - Taxable $8,035 Q C315FA Higher Education Information System Maintenance/Upgrades $48,065 R C315FC Postle Partial Replacement $204,726 S C315FD Electrical Repairs $5,000,000 T C315FV Mathematical Biosciences Buildings Renovations $12,567 U C315GC Newton Hall Renovation/Addition $62,521 V C315GZ Biomedical and Materials Engineering Complex $626,728 W C315HM Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster $6,000,000 X C315HW Columbus Speech and Hearing Care Facility $300,000 Y C315HZ Campus Safety Grant Program $215,976 Z C315IF Reed Hall Theatre Renovation - Lima $32,194 AA C315IP Boiler Replacement - Marion $7,508 AB C315IQ Reese Center Boiler/Chiller Replacement - Newark $98,578 AC C315JK Mansfield Campus-Wide Upgrades $445,848 AD C315JO Evans Lab Partial Demolition (1969 Addition) $2,137,767 AE C315JP Chiller/Tower Renewal $1,407,907 AF C315JQ Science Building Safety and Renovations - Lima $350,300 AG C315JR Cook Hall Restrooms - Lima $98,793 AH C315JS Galvin Hall Phase II - Lima $900,000 AI C315JU Campus Concrete Work - Lima $8,311 AJ C315JV Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield $1,700,000 AK C315JX Maynard Hall Renovations - Marion $162,491 AL C315JY Library Classroom Building Renovations - Marion $550,000 AM C315JZ Morrill Hall Fire Panel/Elevator Update - Marion $805,361 AN C315KA LeFevre Hall Chiller and Cooling Tower Replacement - Newark $14,777 AO C315KB Pavement Improvements - Newark $41,288 AP C315KC Hopewell/Adena Faculty Office Renovations - Newark $11,228 AQ C315KD New Campus Entrance - Newark $1,300,200 AR C315KE Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades $1,794,145 AS C315KK PrimaryOne Health Specialty Access Project $250,000 AT C315KL Advanced Radiation Therapy in Clark County, Ohio $750,000 AU C315X2 Integrated Technical Infrastructure $230,199 AV Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $70,229,377 AW Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AX C315DF Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $200,307 AY C315HY OARnet - Taxable $81,285 AZ C315KX Research Portal Project - Taxable $26,588 BA C315KY REV1 Ventures Modern Innovation Center and Incubator - Taxable $500,000 BB C315KZ Heath Port Authority Air Force Lab - Taxable $41,000 BC Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $849,180 BD TOTAL ALL FUNDS $71,078,557 SUPERCOMPUTER CENTER EXPANSION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion, plus up to $70,289. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $70,289 from appropriation item C315D2, Supercomputer Center Expansion. OHIO LIBRARY AND INFORMATION NETWORK The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network, plus up to $8,803. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $8,803 from appropriation item C315DE, Ohio Library and Information Network. ROOF REPAIR AND REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements, plus up to $38,770. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $38,770 from appropriation item C315DM, Roof Repair and Replacements. FIRE SYSTEM REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements, plus up to $50,914. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $50,914 from appropriation item C315DN, Fire System Replacements. HVAC REPAIR AND REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements, plus up to $432,724. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $432,724 from appropriation item C315DP, HVAC Repair and Replacements. BUILDING ENVELOPE REPAIR The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair, plus up to $5,136. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $5,136 from appropriation item C315DS, Building Envelope Repair. PLUMBING REPAIR The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair, plus up to $83,743. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $83,743 from appropriation item C315DT, Plumbing Repair. ROAD/BRIDGE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements, plus up to $32,178. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $32,178 from appropriation item C315DU, Road/Bridge Improvements. ELECTRICAL REPAIRS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs, plus up to $71,467. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $71,467 from appropriation item C315FD, Electrical Repairs. FISHER HALL RENOVATION - WOOSTER The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315HM, Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HM, Fisher Hall Renovation - Wooster, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315DZ, HVAC Repair and Replacements - Wooster. GALVIN HALL PHASE 2 - LIMA The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315JS, Galvin Hall Phase 2 - Lima, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315JS, Galvin Hall Phase 2 - Lima, plus up to $14,692. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $14,692 from appropriation item C315HB, Galvin Hall Basement Renovations - Lima. OVALWOOD HALL CHILLERS AND COOLING TOWER - MANSFIELD The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315JV, Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315JV, Ovalwood Hall Chillers and Cooling Tower - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HC, Boiler Replacement - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HE, HVAC and Emergency Generators - Mansfield, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315HG, Exterior Signs and Walk Renovation – Mansfield. NEW CAMPUS ENTRANCE - NEWARK The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315KD, New Campus Entrance - Newark, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315KD, New Campus Entrance - Newark, plus up to $20,883. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,259 from appropriation item C315HK, Reese Center HVAC Renovations - Newark, and $14,624 from appropriation item C315GL, Founders Hall Renovations – Newark. MARION CAMPUS-WIDE UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315KE, Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315KE, Marion Campus-Wide Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315IL, LED Light Conversions – Marion, plus up to $6,908. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,908 from appropriation item C315HH, Alber Student Center Renovation - Marion. INTEGRATED TECHNICAL INFRASTRUCTURE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure, plus up to $15,713. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,713 from appropriation item C315X2, Integrated Technical Infrastructure. Section 357.24. 1 2 3 A OHU OHIO UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C30025 Southeast Library Warehouse $171,298 E C30075 Infrastructure Improvements $69,559 F C30136 Building Envelope Restorations $224,061 G C30157 Building and Safety System Improvements $148,471 H C30158 Academic Space Renewal $1,095,510 I C30162 Lancaster Building/Infrastructure Renewal $25,075 J C30163 Southern Building/Infrastructure Renewal $15,300 K C30164 Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses $5,000 L C30169 CWRU Health Education Campus $1,000,000 M C30171 Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses $601,670 N C30179 Building Exterior Improvements - Regional Campuses $40,700 O C30181 Lancaster Festival Upgrades $100,000 P C30183 MOV2GO Foundation Facility Expansion $50,000 Q C30185 Lancaster Festival Security Enhancements $100,000 R C30186 Chesterhill Lions Club $50,000 S Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,696,644 T TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,696,644 SOUTHEAST LIBRARY WAREHOUSE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse, plus up to $20,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $20,400 from appropriation item C30025, Southeast Library Warehouse. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements, plus up to $27,462. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $27,462 from appropriation item C30075, Infrastructure Improvements. BUILDING ENVELOPE RESTORATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations, plus up to $13,400. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,400 from appropriation item C30136, Building Envelope Restorations. ACADEMIC SPACE RENEWAL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal, plus up to $202,858. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $202,858 from appropriation item C30158, Academic Space Renewal. BUILDING INTERIOR IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $15,105. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,105 from appropriation item C30164, Building Interior Improvements - Regional Campuses. CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS - REGIONAL CAMPUSES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses, plus up to $570,856. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Ohio University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $570,856 from appropriation item C30171, Campus Infrastructure Improvements - Regional Campuses. Section 357.25. 1 2 3 A OTC OWENS COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38824 Access Improvement Projects $181,315 E C38834 HVAC Renovation and Replacement $1,106,810 F C38840 Findlay Family YMCA $400,000 G C38853 Owens Community College Robotics and PLC Lab Expansion (Perrysburg) $450,200 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,138,325 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,138,325 Section 357.26. 1 2 3 A RGC RIO GRANDE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35608 College Completion to Career Center $8,290 E Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $8,290 F Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) G C35620 Technology Infrastructure Information System - Taxable $326,754 H C35624 Jackson Center Acquisition and Renovation - Taxable $177,877 I C35630 Basic Renovations - Taxable $987,087 J C35631 Rio Grande Community College Expansion - Taxable $171,900 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,663,618 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,671,908 Section 357.27. 1 2 3 A SSC SHAWNEE STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C32400 Basic Renovations $2,694,121 E C32431 Clark Memorial Library - Rehabilitation and Repurposing $489,500 F C32438 Campus Safety Grant Program $55,936 G C32439 Shawnee State University Campus Gateway and Innovation District $160,100 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,399,657 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C32437 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $299,942 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $299,942 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,699,599 BASIC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations, plus up to $36,912. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Shawnee State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $36,912 from appropriation item C32400, Basic Renovations. Section 357.28. 1 2 3 A SCC SINCLAIR COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C37745 Advanced Manufacturing and Skilled Trades Training Hub $3,500,000 E C37764 Greater West Dayton Incubator $300,000 F C37768 Campus-Wide General Plumbing Replacement $2,967,992 G C37769 Campus-Wide Chiller Replacement $374,250 H C37770 Energy Conservation/Basic Renovations $3,000,000 I C37773 Learning Environment Renovations $2,037,997 J C37776 Air Handler Replacements $2,623,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $14,803,239 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C37756 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $11,679 N C37780 Food Service Renovations Centerville - Taxable $122,805 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $134,484 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,937,723 Section 357.29. 1 2 3 A SOC SOUTHERN STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C32200 Basic Renovations $2,538,816 E C32225 Campus Security Systems Project $187,924 F C32229 Campus Safety Grant Program $256,448 G C32232 Ohio Christian University Organic Chemistry Laboratories $150,000 H C32233 Southern State Community College Technology Center of Excellence $1,385,930 I C32234 Information Technology Center of Excellence $1,000,000 J Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,519,118 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) L C32228 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $38,281 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $38,281 N TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,557,399 Section 357.30. 1 2 3 A STC STARK TECHNICAL COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C38921 HVAC Repair and Replacements $248,489 E C38924 Parking Lot Resurfacing $5,000 F C38934 Barberton Headstart Expansion $200,000 G C38942 Campus Safety Grant Program $5,746 H C38944 Campus Security Upgrades $60,242 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $519,477 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C38941 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $23,395 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $23,395 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $542,872 PARKING LOT RESURFACING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38900, Basic Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C38935, Roof Replacements, plus up to $481,465. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Stark Technical College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,901 from appropriation item C38924, Parking Lot Resurfacing, $58,571 from appropriation item C38929, Akron Education Workforce Ctr, and $415,993 from appropriation item C38937, 21st Century Campus Digital Transformation Project. Section 357.31. 1 2 3 A TTC TERRA STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36427 Campus Safety Grant Program $5,650 E C36432 Elevator Upgrades $5,000 F C36434 Academic Learning Lab Renovations $180,000 G C36435 Roof Replacements $220,177 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $410,827 I Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) J C36426 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $177,082 K Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $177,082 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $587,909 CAMPUS SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36427, Campus Safety Grant Program, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36427, Campus Safety Grant Program, plus up to $17,030. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $17,030 from appropriation item C36419, Repaving Parking Lots. ELEVATOR UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36432, Elevator Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36432, Elevator Upgrades, plus up to $11,071. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $11,071 from appropriation item C36422, Building B Server Room Duct Work. ACADEMIC LEARNING LAB RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36434, Academic Learning Lab Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36434, Academic Learning Lab Renovations, plus up to $24,907. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,792 from appropriation item C36417, Ohio Partnership for Water, Industrial, and Cyber Security, and $18,115 from appropriation item C36424, Math Laboratory Renovation. ROOF REPLACEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C36435, Roof Replacements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C36435, Roof Replacements, plus up to $52,023. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Terra State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $15,016 from appropriation item C36412, Water and Sewage Renovation, and $37,007 from appropriation item C36420, Building E Renovations. Section 357.32. 1 2 3 A UAK UNIVERSITY OF AKRON B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C25007 GodRich Food and Farmer's Project $300,000 E C25086 Ashland County - West Holmes Career Center Workforce Development Center $300,000 F C25091 Canton Jewish Community Project $50,000 G C25097 Polsky Arts Center $5,000,000 H Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,650,000 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,650,000 Section 357.33. 1 2 3 A UCN UNIVERSITY OF CINCINNATI B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C26697 Vontz Center Roof, Panel, and Window Replacements $277,114 E C266B2 Ohio Cyber Range $662,662 F C266D2 One Building, Thriving Families $650,000 G C266D6 The Dragonfly Foundation Landing Renovations $320,000 H C266D7 Mercantile Library Improvements $125,000 I C266D8 Urban League Renovation & Addition $145,000 J C266D9 Meals on Wheels Facility Improvement $750,000 K C266E1 Santa Maria Community Facility $450,000 L Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $3,379,776 M Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) N C266A9 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $15,167 O Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $15,167 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,394,943 Section 357.34. 1 2 3 A UTO UNIVERSITY OF TOLEDO B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C34080 Building Envelope/Weatherproofing $5,000 E C34095 Underground Steam/Condensate Infrastructure Improvements $5,000 F C340A5 ProMedica Transformative Low Income Medical Senior Housing $250,000 G C340B3 Reverse Osmosis Auto Watering System for Research Animals $526,112 H C340B9 University of Toledo Hillel $50,000 I C340C3 Campus Safety Grant Program $19,890 J C340C6 Space Replacement/Consolidation $336,514 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,192,516 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) M C340C1 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $172,606 N C340C9 Research Lab Renovation - Taxable $6,097 O C340E5 Toledo Innovation Center - Taxable $450,000 P Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $628,703 Q TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,821,219 BUILDING ENVELOPE/WEATHERPROOFING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34080, Building Envelope/Weatherproofing, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34072, Building Automation System Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C340B2, Wireless Infrastructure Upgrade. Section 357.35. 1 2 3 A WTC WASHINGTON STATE COMMUNITY COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C35800 Basic Renovations $155,302 E C35807 WTC Health Sciences Center $31,904 F C35814 Main Building Door and Window Replacement/Drivit Repairs $15,318 G C35817 Campus Safety Grant Program $28,766 H C35824 Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades $1,142,000 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $1,373,290 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) K C35816 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $154,626 L Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $154,626 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,527,916 ARTS & SCIENCES WINDOW AND HVAC UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C35824, Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C35824, Arts & Sciences Window and HVAC Upgrades, plus up to $11,779. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Washington State Community College shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $11,779 from appropriation item C35800, Basic Renovations. Section 357.36. 1 2 3 A WSU WRIGHT STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C27570 Envelope Repairs $109,203 E C27571 Wellfield Remediation $138,344 F C27577 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $34,048 G C27578 University Safety Initiative $1,819,960 H C27579 Pedestrian Tunnel Renewal $85,208 I C27582 Campus Paving and Grounds $252,999 J C27585 Campus Energy Efficiency and Controls $245,815 K C27589 Gas Line Replacement $3,933,606 L C27590 Workforce Development Center - Lake Campus $1,517,775 M C27594 Health College Renovation $1,225,750 N C27598 405 Xenia Avenue Market Redevelopment $150,000 O C275A2 Lake Campus Infrastructure $369,538 P C275A5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrade Project $100,000 Q C275A6 Infinity Labs Power House $250,000 R C275A7 Northwest Health and Wellness Campus $200,000 S C275A8 Village of Camden Technology Center $175,000 T C275A9 Campus Safety Grant Program $143,885 U C275B3 Student Union Atrium Renovation $126,299 V C275B4 Paul Laurence Dunbar Library Renovation $957,011 W C275B5 Campus Restroom Upgrades $300,000 X C275B6 Laboratory Animal Resources Occupational Safety Phase II $11,233 Y C275B9 Campus Safety Exterior Cameras and Access Control $500,000 Z C275D3 Healthy Family Market/Dayton Children's Westside Pediatric Center $500,000 AA C275D4 Aerospace, Medicine, and Human Performance National Center of Excellence - Wright State University $400,000 AB C275D5 Wright State University Archives Facilities Upgrades $250,000 AC Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $13,795,674 AD Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) AE C27599 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $31,468 AF C275A1 Fairborn Fiber Expansion Project - Taxable $75,000 AG C275C2 Energy Efficiency and Controls - Taxable $88,763 AH C275D2 University Safety Initiative - Taxable $41,958 AI C275D6 Workforce Development Center - Taxable $500,000 AJ C275D7 USAF Research Partnership - Taxable $250,000 AK Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $987,189 AL TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,782,863 UNIVERSITY SAFETY INITIATIVE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative, plus up to $13,623. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $13,623 from appropriation item C27578, University Safety Initiative. LAKE CAMPUS INFRASTRUCTURE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure, plus up to $41,447. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Wright State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $41,447 from appropriation item C275A2, Lake Campus Infrastructure. Section 357.37. 1 2 3 A YSU YOUNGSTOWN STATE UNIVERSITY B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C34500 Basic Renovations $582,723 E C34509 Basic Renovations - Steubenville $287,837 F C34518 Campus-Wide Building Systems Upgrades $24,404 G C34523 Campus Development $7,283 H C34524 Instructional Space Upgrades $6,375 I C34541 Utility Distribution Upgrade/Expansion $73,201 J C34556 Cushwa Hall Renovation/Expansion $85,734 K C34560 Campus Roof Replacements $41,719 L C34561 Building Envelope Renovations $61,800 M C34565 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $76,132 N C34575 Building Exterior Door and Window Replacements $577,732 O C34576 Garfield Building Renovations $1,371,101 P C34577 Emergency Generator Upgrades $1,000,000 Q C34587 Ohio Hills Quaker City Health Center $100,000 R C34592 Rich Center for Autism Building Tomorrow $450,000 S C34593 YNG Aviation Education Center $350,000 T Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $5,096,041 U Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) V C34503 Kilcawley Center Renovations - Taxable $97,531 W C34555 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $364,630 X C34596 Eastern Ohio Biztown Financial Literacy & Entrepreneurship Center - Taxable $250,000 Y C34597 Regional Workforce Training and Community Center - Taxable $250,000 Z C34598 Brite Energy Innovators - Taxable $500,000 AA Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $1,462,161 AB TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,558,202 BASIC RENOVATIONS - STEUBENVILLE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34509, Basic Renovations - Steubenville, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34509, Basic Renovations - Steubenville, plus up to $287,837. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Higher Education shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $117,502 from appropriation item C38623, HVAC/Plumbing Maintenance, $155,785 from appropriation item C38600, Basic Renovations, and $14,550 from appropriation item C38630, Dental Laboratory Renovation. INSTRUCTIONAL SPACE UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34524, Instructional Space Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34524, Instructional Space Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34514, Ward Beecher HVAC Upgrade, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34549, Ward Beecher Science Hall Renovation, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34554, Innovation/Commercial Center, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34578, STEM Science Laboratory Renovations, plus up to $12,925. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Youngstown State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $12,925 from appropriation item C34556, Cushwa Hall Physical Therapy Renovations/Expansion. BUILDING ENVELOPE RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C34561, Building Envelope Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34561, Building Envelope Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34521, Masonry Restoration, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C34559, Pedestrian Bridge Renovations, plus up to $23,185. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, Youngstown State University shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $9,836 from appropriation item C34535, Building Exterior Repairs, and $13,349 from appropriation item C34557, Ward Beecher Science Hall Structural Improvements. Section 357.38. 1 2 3 A MAT ZANE STATE COLLEGE B Reappropriations C Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) D C36215 Workforce Based Training and Equipment $112,495 E C36218 Zanesville Campus Renovations $1,345,712 F C36233 Zane State Regional Engineering Hub $625,000 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $2,083,207 H Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) I C36226 Workforce Based Training and Equipment - Taxable $367,182 J Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) Total $367,182 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,450,389 Section 357.41. For all reappropriations in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) that require local funds to be contributed by any state-supported or state-assisted institution of higher education, the Department of Higher Education shall not recommend that any funds be released until the recipient institution demonstrates to the Department of Higher Education and the Office of Budget and Management that the local funds contribution requirement has been secured or satisfied. The local funds shall be in addition to the reappropriations in this act. Section 357.42. None of the capital reappropriations in this act for state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education shall be expended until the particular appropriation has been recommended for release by the Department of Higher Education and released by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Either the institution concerned, or the Department of Higher Education with the concurrence of the institution concerned, may initiate the request to the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for the release of the particular appropriation. Section 357.43. (A) No capital reappropriations in this act made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) or the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024) shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, construction, or acquisition of capital facilities if the institution of higher education or the state does not own the real property on which the capital facilities are or will be located. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The institution has a long-term (at least twenty years) lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) The Department of Higher Education certifies to the Controlling Board that undue delay will occur if planning does not proceed while the property or property interest acquisition process continues. In this case, funds may be released upon approval of the Controlling Board to pay for planning through the development of schematic drawings only. (3) In the case of a reappropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or will be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization or public body and will be made available to the institution of higher education for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization or public body either owns or has a long-term (at least twenty years) lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement with the institution of higher education that meets the requirements of division (C) of this section. (B) Any reappropriations that require cooperation between a technical college and a branch campus of a university may be released by the Controlling Board upon recommendation by the Department of Higher Education that the facilities proposed by the institutions are: (1) The result of a joint planning effort by the university and the technical college, satisfactory to the Department of Higher Education; (2) Facilities that will meet the needs of the region in terms of technical and general education, taking into consideration the totality of facilities that will be available after the completion of the projects; (3) Planned to permit maximum joint use by the university and technical college of the totality of facilities that will be available upon their completion; and (4) To be located on or adjacent to the branch campus of the university. (C) The Department of Higher Education shall adopt and maintain rules regarding the release of moneys from all the appropriations for capital facilities for all state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education. In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(3) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreements shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not fewer than twenty years, with the value of such use or benefit or right to use to be, as is determined by the parties and approved by the Department of Higher Education, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriations; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use be terminated prior to the expiration of its full term; (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act; and (4) Provide for payment or reimbursement to the institution of its administrative costs incurred as a result of the facilities project, not to exceed 1.5 percent of the appropriated amount. (D) Upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, the Controlling Board may approve the transfer of appropriations for projects requiring cooperation between institutions from one institution to another institution with the approval of both institutions. (E) Notwithstanding section 127.14 of the Revised Code, the Controlling Board, upon the recommendation of the Department of Higher Education, may transfer amounts appropriated to the Department of Higher Education to accounts of state-supported or state-assisted institutions created for that same purpose. Section 357.45. The requirements of Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code, with respect to the powers and duties of the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission as they relate to the procedure and awarding of contracts for capital improvement projects, and the requirements of section 127.16 of the Revised Code, with respect to the Controlling Board, do not apply to projects of community college districts and technical college districts. Section 357.46. Those institutions locally administering capital improvement projects pursuant to sections 3345.50 and 3345.51 of the Revised Code may: (A) Establish charges for recovering costs directly related to project administration as defined by the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. The Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, in consultation with the Office of Budget and Management, shall review and approve these administrative charges when the charges are in excess of 1.5 percent of the total construction budget, provided that total administrative charges paid by the state do not exceed four percent of the state's contribution to the total construction budget. (B) Seek reimbursement from state capital appropriations to the institution for the in-house design services performed by the institution for the capital projects. Acceptable charges are limited to design document preparation work that is done by the institution. These reimbursable design costs shall be shown as "A/E fees" within the project's budget that is submitted to the Controlling Board or the Director of Budget and Management as part of a request for release of funds. The reimbursement for in-house design shall not exceed seven percent of the estimated construction cost. Section 357.47. TRANSFERS OF HIGHER EDUCATION CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The Director of Budget and Management may as necessary to maintain the exclusion from the calculation of gross income for federal income taxation purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1 et seq., with respect to obligations issued to fund projects appropriated from the Higher Education Improvement Fund: (A) Transfer appropriations between the Higher Education Improvement Fund and the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund; (B) Create new appropriation items within the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund and make transfers of appropriations to them for projects originally funded from appropriations made from the Higher Education Improvement Fund. The projects that are funded under new appropriation items created in this manner shall automatically be designated as specific for purposes of section 126.14 of the Revised Code. Section 359.10. 1 2 3 A ETC BROADCAST EDUCATIONAL MEDIA COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C37428 Ohio Public TV-Radio $55,450 E C37429 Ohio Radio Reading Services Equipment $51,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $106,450 G Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) H C37406 Network Operations Center Upgrades $936,847 I Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $936,847 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,043,297 NETWORK OPERATIONS CENTER UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C37406, Network Operations Center Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37406, Network Operations Center Upgrades, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C37410, Ohio Radio Reading Services. Section 361.10. 1 2 3 A CSR CAPITOL SQUARE REVIEW AND ADVISORY BOARD B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C87407 Statehouse Repair and Improvements $574,262 E C87412 Capitol Square Security $5,000,000 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $5,574,262 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,574,262 Section 363.10. 1 2 3 A DAS DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C10000 Governor's Residence $3,077,660 E C10010 Office Services Building Renovations $113,435 F C10015 SOCC Renovations $1,043,396 G C10020 North High Building Complex Renovations $306,495 H C10021 Office Space Planning $7,000,000 I C10042 IT Projects $995,489 J C10051 Fleet Sustainability $500,000 K Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $13,036,475 L Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) M C10041 MARCS - Taxable $9,056,200 N C10052 Symmes Valley Tower Project in Lawrence County $214,000 O C10057 Medina County Radio System - Seville Tower $100,000 P C10058 Portsmouth MARCS $200,000 Q Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) Total $9,570,200 R Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) S C10035 Building Improvement $10,000,000 T Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) Total $10,000,000 U TOTAL ALL FUNDS $32,606,675 IT PROJECTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10042, IT Projects, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10042, IT Projects, plus up to $128,755. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $128,755 from appropriation item C10042, IT Projects. MARCS - TAXABLE The foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, shall be used to purchase or construct the components of MARCS that are not specific to any one agency. The equipment may include, but is not limited to, computer and telecommunications equipment used for the functioning and integration of the system, communications towers, tower sites, tower equipment, and linkages among towers. The Director of Administrative Services shall determine the specific use of funds. Expenditures from this appropriation shall not be subject to Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, plus up to $39,583. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $39,583 from appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable. BUILDING IMPROVEMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, plus up to $111,746. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $111,746 from appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement. Section 365.10. 1 2 3 A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C70007 Building and Grounds Renovations $7,807,835 E C70022 Agricultural Society Facilities $100,000 F C70024 Building #22 Renovation $992,821 G C70030 Agriculture Equipment $416,504 H C70033 Animal Disease Laboratory $4,252,343 I Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $13,569,503 J Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) K C70009 Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund $15,980,966 L Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) Total $15,980,966 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $29,550,469 BUILDING AND GROUNDS RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations, plus up to $255,186. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Agriculture shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $255,186 from appropriation item C70007, Building and Grounds Renovations. Section 365.15. AGRICULTURAL SOCIETY FACILITIES The foregoing appropriation item C70022, Agricultural Society Facilities, shall be used to support the projects in this section. 1 2 A Project List B Columbiana County Junior Fair Agriculture and Event Center $100,000 Section 367.10. 1 2 3 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B Reappropriations C Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) D C80041 Data Analytics $1,400,000 E Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $1,400,000 F Division Of Administration Fund (Fund 1630) G C80048 IT Infrastructure, Applications, and Improvements $1,300,000 H Division Of Administration Fund (Fund 1630) Total $1,300,000 I State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) J C80005 IT Infrastructure $1,200,000 K C80023 SFM Renovations and Improvements $974,650 L C80034 Fire Training Apparatus $2,060,317 M C80040 Green Township Department - CPR $15,000 N C80042 Fire Training Structure $3,460,467 O State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) Total $7,710,434 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $10,410,434 Section 369.10. 1 2 3 A DDD DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES B Reappropriations C Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) D C59034 Statewide Developmental Centers $12,500,000 E C59077 Vocational Guidance Services Workforce Center $300,000 F C59084 Opportunity for All Building - Community Recreation Center for the Developmentally Disabled $200,000 G C59087 STEAM and Sensory Motor/Stress Relief for Children and Teachers $25,000 H C59093 Inclusive Multigenerational Community and Recreation Center (IMCRC) $1,000,000 I Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $14,025,000 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $14,025,000 Section 370.10. 1 2 3 A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH B Reappropriations C Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) D C44001 IT Equipment and Software $1,506,860 E Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $1,506,860 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $1,506,860 Section 371.10. 1 2 3 A MHA DEPARTMENT OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH B Reappropriations C Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) D C58001 Community Assistance Projects $20,775,720 E C58007 Infrastructure Renovations $90,731,528 F C58048 Community Resiliency Projects $7,388,043 G C58050 Community Support $26,453,235 H Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033) Total $145,348,526 I TOTAL ALL FUNDS $145,348,526 Section 371.13. COMMUNITY ASSISTANCE PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item C58001, Community Assistance Projects, may be used for facilities constructed or to be constructed pursuant to Chapter 340., 5119., 5123., or 5126. of the Revised Code or the authority granted by section 154.20 and other applicable sections of the Revised Code and the rules issued pursuant to those chapters and that section. The appropriation shall be distributed by the Department of Behavioral Health subject to Controlling Board approval. Section 371.15. INFRASTRUCTURE RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, plus up to $351,759. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Behavioral Health shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $179,459 from appropriation item C58007, Infrastructure Renovations, $72,796 from appropriation item C58008, Emergency Improvements, and $99,505 from appropriation item C58010, Campus Consolidation. COMMUNITY RESILIENCY PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item, C58048, Community Resiliency Projects, shall be used in support of the establishment, expansion, and renovation of programming spaces for individuals affected by behavioral health related issues, specifically targeting, to the extent possible, programming spaces for middle and high school age youth affected by behavioral health related issues. Funds shall be awarded to projects through a process to be developed by the Department of Behavioral Health that may take into account, but is not limited to, the following factors: the poverty rate of the community in which the facility is to be located, the breadth and nature of the plan to engage a broad spectrum of at-risk youth, support of community partners, readiness of the funding applicant to move forward with the project, and the array of supportive programming to be offered by the applicant. All projects shall comply with the community project standards and guidelines of the Department of Behavioral Health. Section 371.20. COMMUNITY SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. 1 2 A Project List B Gracehaven-Multipurpose Building $2,500,000 C Cuyahoga Commission Restoration of Mental Health Diversion Center $1,700,000 D Cleveland Christian Home - Child Wellness Campus $1,500,000 E Bellefaire Jewish Children's Bureau Child and Youth Service Center $1,000,000 F Dayton Boys and Girls Club (Miami Chapel Inspire Zone) $1,000,000 G Greater Dayton Regional Hospital Association $800,000 H Bellefaire Child and Youth Services Center $750,000 I LADD Forever Home $720,000 J Providence House East Side Campus Community Hub $700,000 K Cleveland Clinic Akron General $700,000 L Faith Mission Life Safety and Critical Improvements $560,000 M Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $500,000 N Whitney Manor $500,000 O Vista Village $500,000 P Ravenwood Health Renovation $500,000 Q Clark County Family Justice Center $500,000 R Tri-County Response Center Project $500,000 S Tri-County Board of Recovery and Mental Health Services $450,000 T Applewood Centers Inc. $425,000 U Providence House $400,000 V May Dugan Center Renovation $400,000 W Integrated Community Solutions Community Center $350,000 X Shelby Health & Wellness Renovation Project $350,000 Y Alvis House $300,000 Z Journey Center for Safety and Healing $300,000 AA Western Reserve Area on Aging $300,000 AB Cleveland Rape Crisis Center $250,000 AC Cedar Hills Transformation Camp $250,000 AD Sisters of Charity Health System and Sisters of Charity Foundation of Cleveland $250,000 AE Ashtabula County Transitional Housing for Homeless Youth $250,000 AF Lower Lights Christian Health Center $250,000 AG Alliance Area Domestic Violence Shelter $250,000 AH Alliance YWCA Headquarters Improvements $250,000 AI The Refuge - New Building $250,000 AJ Tobacco Treatment Center of Ohio $250,000 AK Wayfinders Ohio Emergency Homeless Shelter $250,000 AL Adams County $250,000 AM YWCA Greater Cincinnati Domestic Violence Shelter East $250,000 AN Center for Addiction Treatment Recovery House $250,000 AO Addiction Services Council Facility Expansion $230,000 AP Richland County Shelter Renovation Project $217,235 AQ Cincinnati Children's Hospital Youth Mental Health Facility $210,000 AR West Dayton Community Services Center (Easter Seals Miami Valley) $200,000 AS Union Miles Development Corp (Walt Collins Veterans Housing Facility) $200,000 AT Star House $200,000 AU CommQuest Recovery Campus Improvements $200,000 AV Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Akron Project $200,000 AW Sanctuary Night - Expanding to Meet the Need $200,000 AX Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Stow Buildout $200,000 AY Washington County Boys and Girls Club $175,000 AZ Y-Haven YMCA of Greater Cleveland $150,000 BA Pathways for Women $150,000 BB OhioGuidestone Youth and Family Resiliency Center $150,000 BC City of Franklin $150,000 BD Square One Meigs $150,000 BE Uptown Smiles Clinical Renovations $125,000 BF Lorain County Safe Harbor $115,000 BG Henry County $110,000 BH Seven Hills Trauma Recovery Center $105,000 BI Shelby Mercy Mission House Renovations $101,000 BJ Comprehensive Health Care at the Centers, Gordon Square $100,000 BK Y-Haven YWCA of Greater Cleveland $100,000 BL Livingston Avenue Community New Direction Project $100,000 BM The Cocoon Project for Survivors of Domestic and Sexual Violence $100,000 BN Beyond the Walls $100,000 BO Blue Line Foundation HQ & Regional Training Center $100,000 BP Haven Home Renovations $100,000 BQ Mansfield Domestic Violence Shelter Child Advocacy Center Renovation $100,000 BR Toledo Lutheran Social Services Expansion Project $100,000 BS CommQuest $100,000 BT Women's Resource Center of Hancock County $100,000 BU YMCA Competitive Sports Training Facility $75,000 BV Muskingum Behavioral Health Improvements $57,000 BW Veterans Resource Center Project $50,000 BX Cadence Care Network Family and Community Resource Center $50,000 BY Harbor Crisis Stabilization Unit $50,000 BZ Homesafe - Ashtabula $40,000 CA The Commons at Springfield $25,000 CB Women's Recovery Center $13,000 Section 373.10. 1 2 3 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C725D5 Fountain Square Building Improvements $2,185,561 E C725E0 ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading $109,545 F C725N7 District Office Renovations $276,420 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,571,526 H Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) I C72514 Clean Ohio Trail Fund $3,841,416 J Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) Total $3,841,416 K Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) L C72549 ODNR Facilities Development $2,063,611 M C725E1 Local Parks Projects - Statewide $686,330 N C725E5 Project Planning $1,225,000 O C725J0 Natural Areas/Preserves Maintenance/Facilities $1,124,081 P C725J6 Ohio and Erie Canal $3,285,000 Q C725K0 State Park Renovations and Upgrading $2,513,319 R C725M0 Dam Rehabilitation $51,826 S Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031) Total $10,949,167 T Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) U C725A0 State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins $31,247,561 V C725C4 Muskingum River Lock and Dam $17,417,077 W C725E2 Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects $49,407,300 X C725E6 Project Planning $5,000 Y C725L8 Statewide Trails Program $18,907,428 Z C725M5 Lake Erie Islands State Park/Middle Bass Island State Park $11,747 AA C725N6 Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades $94,065 AB C725R3 State Parks Renovations and Upgrades $17,052,040 AC C725R4 Dam Rehabilitation - Parks $18,889,505 AD C725U4 Operations Equipment $8,796,400 AE C725U9 Recreation Facilities $11,066,588 AF Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) Total $172,894,711 AG State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) AH C725V4 Parks ARPA $932,140 AI C725V5 Trails ARPA $76,627 AJ C725V6 Wastewater/Water Systems ARPA $302,681 AK State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) Total $1,311,448 AL Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) AM C725K9 Wildlife Area Building Renovations $40,988,784 AN Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015) Total $40,988,784 AO TOTAL ALL FUNDS $232,557,052 FEDERAL REIMBURSEMENT All reimbursements received from the federal government for any expenditures made pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the fund from which the expenditure originated. CLEAN OHIO TRAIL FUND The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund, plus up to $3,466,877. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $3,466,877 from appropriation item C72514, Clean Ohio Trail Fund. ODNR FAIRGROUNDS AREAS UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725E0, ODNR Fairgrounds Areas Upgrading, plus up to $200,170. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $113,218 from appropriation item C725D5, Fountain Square Building Improvements, and $86,952 from appropriation item C725N7, District Office Renovations. STATE PARK RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADING The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, plus up to $836,383. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $19,881 from appropriation item C72549, ODNR Facilities Development, $367,941 from appropriation item C725E1, Local Parks Projects - Statewide, $7,137 from appropriation item C725K0, State Park Renovations and Upgrading, $429,182 from appropriation item C725M0, Dam Rehabilitation, and $12,242 from appropriation item C725N5, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades. STATE PARKS RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, plus up to $8,348,822. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Natural Resources shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $6,185,743 from appropriation item C725A0, State Parks Campgrounds, Lodges, and Cabins, $24,960 from appropriation item C725B2, Parks Equipment, $33,377 from appropriation item C725B5, Buckeye Lake Dam Rehabilitation, $5,923 from appropriation item C725C4, Muskingum River Lock and Dam, $13,327 from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, $21,813 from appropriation item C725L8, Statewide Trails Program, $179,725 from appropriation item C725N6, Wastewater/Water Systems Upgrades, $112,826 from appropriation item C725R3, State Parks Renovations and Upgrades, and $1,771,128 from appropriation item C725R4, Dam Rehabilitation - Parks. Section 373.15. The foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all unreleased local parks projects and allowable administrative costs specified in this section, unless amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. 1 2 A Project List B Heritage Trail Extension $2,500,000 C Cheryl Allen Center Improvements $2,000,000 D Cleveland Tower City and Bedrock Development Activities $2,000,000 E Smale Riverfront Park $1,700,000 F West Liberty W. Columbus St. Bridge $1,265,000 G Cincinnati Findlay Community and Recreation Center $1,200,000 H Gateway to Freedom Park $1,200,000 I French Creek Sports Complex $1,075,000 J Hoover Reservoir Crew $1,000,000 K Walnut Township Flood Mitigation Project - Final Design and Implementation Plan $1,000,000 L South Point Community Pool $1,000,000 M The Wilds RV Park and Campground $900,000 N Irishtown Bend and Canal Basin Park $765,000 O Upper Arlington Riverside Drive Shared Use Path $750,000 P Detroit Shoreway Project $750,000 Q Environmental Education Pavilion at Forest Lawn Stormwater Park $750,000 R Price Hill Sports Complex $650,000 S Greater Dayton School Project $600,000 T Battery Park Coastal Improvements $500,000 U Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 V North Ridgeville Mills Creek $500,000 W Oak Harbor Waterfront $500,000 X Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center, Inc. (MOVAC) $500,000 Y Sidney Feeder Canal Bike Trail $500,000 Z Kurt Tunnell Memorial Trail $500,000 AA Bradfield Community Recreation Center $480,000 AB Geneva Township Park - Old Lake Road Shoreline Restoration $450,000 AC Mentor Marsh Observation Tower $450,000 AD Lexington Depot Park and Trailhead $425,000 AE Mosquito Creek Lake Park Improvements $404,000 AF Buckeye Lake Feeder Channel Restoration $400,000 AG Solon to Chagrin Falls Multi-Purpose Trail $400,000 AH Kelleys Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 AI City of Grove City Town Center Playground $400,000 AJ Lake Metroparks Lake Erie Shoreline Trail and Revetment Wall $400,000 AK Fairlawn connector trails $400,000 AL Wapakoneta Parking and Pedestrian Plaza Project $380,000 AM Boeckling Building Pier $350,000 AN Alum Creek Pedestrian/Bike Bridge - Bexley $350,000 AO Wauseon Community Social and Recreational Center $350,000 AP Fairport Harbor Marina Boat Launch $350,000 AQ Gateway Regional Sports Complex $350,000 AR Put-in-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $350,000 AS Copley Road Trail East $350,000 AT Sheffield Village French Creek Project $325,000 AU Marina Boat Dock Riverside Renovation $300,000 AV Solon-Chagrin Falls Multi-purpose Trail $300,000 AW Final Third Foundation's Pathways Park Facility Development $300,000 AX Scout Achievement Center $300,000 AY Wadsworth Inclusive Playground at Valley View Elementary $300,000 AZ Glenford Earthworks Phase III $300,000 BA Camp Joy $300,000 BB The Harold D. Miller Park Improvement Project $300,000 BC Heights to Hudson Trail $250,000 BD Coke Oven Community Civic Center Park $250,000 BE Canal Basin Park - Riverfront Connections $250,000 BF SPIRE Institute and Academy $250,000 BG Village of Minerva Park Trail Improvement Project $250,000 BH Roadway and Recreation Walking Track Repair $250,000 BI Johnstown Splash Pad $250,000 BJ Black River School Playground Surface and Walking Track $250,000 BK Putnam County Historical Society Museum $250,000 BL Plain Township Legacy Park Amphitheater $250,000 BM Vienna Air Heritage Park $250,000 BN Mid-Ohio Aquatic Center $250,000 BO Beverly Island Park Bridge $250,000 BP Lockington Trail Bridge $250,000 BQ J. Babe Stern Ball Field $250,000 BR Timken Gatehouse Renovation $250,000 BS JCC of Greater Columbus $243,000 BT Cave Lake Dam $225,000 BU Chillicothe Paint Creek Recreational Trail $215,000 BV Lawrence County Union Rome Trails and Walkways $214,000 BW Mandel Jewish Community Center Preston's H.O.P.E Playground $210,000 BX Bradstreet's Landing Pier, Lakefront Access and Resiliency Improvements $200,000 BY City of Monroe Lookout Point $200,000 BZ Union and Rome Township Trails Project $200,000 CA Munson Springs Nature Preserve and Historical Site $200,000 CB Shared Use Path Connector (Goosepond Road-Licking Health Department) $200,000 CC Lorain County Metro Park Connector $200,000 CD Great Miami Riverway Recreational Trail $200,000 CE Mount Aloysius Community Rec Center $200,000 CF Radnor Township Park Improvements $160,000 CG Center Green Stream Restoration Project $150,000 CH McNamara Park Project $150,000 CI Pickerington Soccer Association Facility Improvements $150,000 CJ Wellsville Marina Dredging $150,000 CK Findlay Playground/Grant Park/Over-the-Rhine Recreation Center $150,000 CL Swanton Railroad Park $150,000 CM Antrim Community Center $150,000 CN Mill Creek Valley Conservancy District Corridor Revitalization $150,000 CO Forest Park Central Park Improvements $150,000 CP Buckeye Lake Boat Ramps and Pier Enabling Project $150,000 CQ J. Babe Stern Community Center for At Risk Children $150,000 CR Mount Gilead Park Site Preparations $150,000 CS Summit Lake Vision Plan $150,000 CT Mansfield Central Park $150,000 CU Recreational Project at the Bowling Green Training and Community Center $150,000 CV CROWN Ohio River Trail Safety Improvements $140,000 CW Centerville Mills Park Wetland Boardwalk and Trails System $125,000 CX Old Murray City School Building Demolition $125,000 CY Flight Line: East Dayton Rails-to-Trails $125,000 CZ Fairlawn Gully Water Quality Basins $125,000 DA City of Poland Sheridan Rd. Multi-Use Trail $107,000 DB Minister-Ft. Loramie Multi-Use Trail Connector $100,000 DC Northern Lights Community Center $100,000 DD The Pony Wagon Trail $100,000 DE Addyston Park Upgrades $100,000 DF Miracle Field Complex $100,000 DG Veterans Memorial at Rose Run Park $100,000 DH Mitchell Park Trail Connector $100,000 DI Fairfax Ziegler Park Improvements $100,000 DJ Columbia Twp. Wooster Pike Bike Trail $100,000 DK Holden Arboretum All-Season Trails $100,000 DL Avon Lake Weiss Field Park Pavilion Replacement Project $100,000 DM Syracuse Doggie Park $100,000 DN The Wilds Shade and Shelter Improvements $100,000 DO Paulding County Trails Project $100,000 DP Brunswick Hills Township Park $100,000 DQ Mound Park Pickleball and Tennis Court Resurfacing Project $100,000 DR Ottawa Memorial Pool Splash Pad $100,000 DS Village of Bellville Historic Bandstand Renovations $100,000 DT Hart Crane Park $85,000 DU YMCA of Bucyrus Aquatic Center $80,000 DV 4-H Camp Piedmont Upgrades $75,000 DW Bacci Park Infrastructure and Security Improvements $75,000 DX Geneva-on-the-Lake Shoreline Protection Project $75,000 DY Brook Park Central Park $75,000 DZ Independence Pool Facility Improvements $75,000 EA Middleport-Pomeroy Walking Path Project Phase IV $75,000 EB New Concord Swimming Pool $75,000 EC Sharon Nature Preserve Trails Phase I $75,000 ED Boston Heights - Matthew Thomas Park Trail $75,000 EE Summit Lake Vision Plan $75,000 EF Hiestand Woods Park and Preserve $75,000 EG Madeira Dawson Promenade Connector $70,000 EH Ellsworth Hills Learning Lab $65,000 EI Continental Buckeye Park Improvements $60,000 EJ Cleveland Botanical Garden Public Accessible Garden Path $50,000 EK Jeromesville Square Park $50,000 EL Shade Community Center Upgrades $50,000 EM Barge 225 - Cleveland Metroparks Floating Education Center $50,000 EN Clague Park Cabin Renovation $50,000 EO Bellaire Walking Trail $50,000 EP Big Walnut Trail Extension and Park $50,000 EQ Big Walnut Trail SE Columbus - Eastland Area $50,000 ER Kelley Nature Preserve Boat Ramp $50,000 ES Drews Trak Memorial Pump Track Expansion $50,000 ET P&G MLB Cincinnati Reds Youth Academy $50,000 EU Salt Fork State Park $50,000 EV Center Ice Foundation $50,000 EW Avon Lake Veterans Park Gazebo $50,000 EX Pomeroy Multimodal Path $50,000 EY Keener Park Renovations/Pickleball Courts $50,000 EZ Brunswick Lake ADA Canoe/Kayak Launch $50,000 FA Camp Sherman Park $50,000 FB Village of Bloomdale Reservoir Project $50,000 FC Milford Center Rail Depot $50,000 FD Adena Golden Wave Stadium Renovation $49,000 FE Selby Building Revitalization $45,000 FF Village of Dunkirk Splash Pad and Storage Building $45,000 FG Bruce L Chapin Bridge - Northcoast Inland Trail $45,000 FH Burr Oak State Park $44,000 FI Chippewa Park Shelter House $40,000 FJ Nimisilla Park Excavating $40,000 FK Rittman Splash Pad $40,000 FL Jeromesville Community Garden $35,000 FM Monroeville Clark Park - North Coast Inland Trail Connection $33,000 FN Antwerp Village Community Park $33,000 FO Camp McKinley Improvements $30,000 FP Keener Park Sledding Hill $30,000 FQ Village of Weston Community Splash Pad $30,000 FR East Liverpool Park Improvements $25,000 FS Rayland Friendship Park Restroom Project $25,000 FT Charlement Reservation Stable $25,000 FU Gloria Glens Southwest Park Grading $25,000 FV Willshire Ballpark Enhancements $25,000 FW Osgood Tennis Court $20,000 FX Clifton to Yellow Springs Bike Trail $20,000 FY Rockford Community Park Public Restrooms Improvement $18,000 FZ Wakeman Trail Connector $17,000 GA Sardinia Veteran's Community Park Revitalization $15,000 GB Seville Memorial Park Public Restroom Facilities $15,000 GC Village of Albany Bike Paths $10,000 GD Paulding County Trails Project $7,500 GE Buckeye Trail Boesel Easement Bridge $2,800 Section 373.20. For the projects for which reappropriations are made in this act from the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035), the Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on the estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, within Fund 7035, to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Parks Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 2270), and be reimbursed by Fund 7035 using an intrastate voucher. Section 373.30. For the projects for which reappropriations are made in this act from the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the Ohio Department of Natural Resources shall periodically prepare and submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by the Department of Natural Resources for each project. Based on those estimates, the Director of Budget and Management may release appropriations from appropriation item C725E5, Project Planning, within Fund 7031 to pay for design, planning, and engineering costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources for the projects. Upon release of the appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 4S90) and be reimbursed by Fund 7031 using an intrastate voucher. Section 374.10. 1 2 3 A TAX DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C11001 Enhanced Electronic Filing $397,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $397,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $397,000 Section 377.10. 1 2 3 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C76000 Platform Scales Improvements $550,000 E C76035 Alum Creek Facilities Renovations and Improvements $75,000 F C76036 ODPS Hilltop Complex $5,500,000 G C76044 Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement $50,000 H C76045 Ohio State Highway Patrol Academy Renovation and Improvement $5,000 I C76049 EMA Building Renovation and Improvement $700,000 J Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $6,880,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $6,880,000 PATROL DISTRICT HEADQUARTERS POST RENOVATION AND IMPROVEMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C76044, Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C76044, Patrol District Headquarters Post Renovation and Improvement, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C76050, OSHP Dispatch Center Renovations and Improvements. Section 379.10. 1 2 3 A DRC DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION AND CORRECTION B Reappropriations C Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) D C50100 Local Jails $126,302 E C50101 Community-Based Correctional Facilities $557,176 F C50105 Water System/Plant Improvements $4,872,368 G C50136 General Building Renovation $35,000,000 H C501HO Medina County Sheriff Jail Safety $100,000 I Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) Total $40,655,846 J Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) K C501HF ID Domain Migration and Key Watcher Upgrades $5,000,000 L Capital IT Fund (Fund 7091) Total $5,000,000 M TOTAL ALL FUNDS $45,655,846 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovation, plus up to $6,181,116. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $48,175 from appropriation item C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, $77,452 from appropriation item C50105, Water System/Plant Improvements, $15,292 from appropriation item C50114, Community Residential Program, and $6,040,199 from appropriation item C50136, General Building Renovation. LOCAL JAILS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, plus up to $323,879. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $323,879 from appropriation item C50100, Local Jails. Section 379.20. LOCAL JAILS The foregoing appropriation item C50100, Local Jails, shall be used for the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the project and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the project and project location. In reviewing applications and designating projects, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall prioritize applications and projects that: (1) Target county jails that the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction determines to have the greatest need for construction or renovation work; (2) Improve substantially the condition, safety, and operational ability of the jail; and (3) Benefit jails that are, or will be, used by multiple counties. Section 379.25. COMMUNITY-BASED CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and district community-based correctional facilities. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. Section 379.30. COMMUNITY RESIDENTIAL PROGRAM RENOVATIONS Capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C50114, Community Residential Program, may be used by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, pursuant to sections 5120.103 to 5120.105 of the Revised Code, to provide for the construction or renovation of halfway house facilities for offenders eligible for community supervision by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. Section 381.10. 1 2 3 A DVS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C90085 Veterans' Home Renovation $2,155,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $2,155,000 F Nursing Home - Federal Fund (Fund 3190) G C90074 Sandusky Renovation Federal $3,917,033 H C90077 Georgetown Renovation Federal $8,382,439 I Nursing Home - Federal Fund (Fund 3190) Total $12,299,472 J Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) K C90073 Sandusky Equipment State $807,888 L C90075 Sandusky Renovation State $2,706,795 M C90076 Georgetown Equipment State $541,649 N C90078 Georgetown Renovation State $3,303,620 O Ohio Veterans' Home Improvement Fund (Fund 6040) Total $7,359,952 P TOTAL ALL FUNDS $21,814,424 SANDUSKY RENOVATION FEDERAL The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C90065, Georgetown Resident Safety and Fire Alarm Replacement, C90067, Sandusky Veterans Hall HVAC Mechanical Upgrade, C90080, Georgetown Facility Addition Federal, and C90082, Information Technology Federal, plus up to $110,609. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $85,382 from appropriation item C90074, Sandusky Renovation Federal, and $25,227 from appropriation item C90077, Georgetown Renovation Federal. SANDUSKY RENOVATION STATE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation items C90066, Sandusky Veterans Hall HVAC Mechanical Upgrades, C90079, Georgetown Facility Addition State, and C90081, Information Technology State, plus up to $64,934. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $35,078 from appropriation item C90064, Georgetown Resident Safety and Fire Alarm Replacement, and $29,856 from appropriation item C90075, Sandusky Renovation State. GEORGETOWN RENOVATION STATE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State, plus up to $63,617. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Veterans Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $63,617 from appropriation item C90078, Georgetown Renovation State. Section 383.10. 1 2 3 A DYS DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES B Reappropriations C Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) D C47002 General Institutional Renovations $7,500,000 E C47003 Community Rehabilitation Centers $31,091,223 F C47007 Local Juvenile Detention Centers $350,841 G C47032 Facility Construction $110,916,265 H C47033 Lucas County Juvenile Justice Center/Youth Treatment Center Upgrades $100,000 I Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028) Total $149,958,329 J TOTAL ALL FUNDS $149,958,329 GENERAL INSTITUTIONAL RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47001, Fire Suppression, Safety, and Security. COMMUNITY REHABILITATION CENTERS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, plus up to $1,505,030. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Youth Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $232,539 from appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, and $1,272,491 from appropriation item C47007, Local Juvenile Detention Centers. FACILITY CONSTRUCTION The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C47032, Facility Construction, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47032, Facility Construction, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C47022, Administrative and Education Building Expansions and Additions at Circleville Juvenile Correctional Facility, plus up to $308,430. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Youth Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $170,845 from appropriation item C47002, General Institutional Renovations, and $137,585 from appropriation item C47026, Indian River Program Building. Section 383.20. COMMUNITY REHABILITATION CENTERS For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47003, Community Rehabilitation Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of single-county and multicounty community corrections facilities. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the facility and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the site, program, and construction. For purposes of this section, "community corrections facilities" has the same meaning as in section 5139.36 of the Revised Code. Section 383.30. LOCAL JUVENILE DETENTION CENTERS For capital reappropriations in this act made from appropriation item C47007, Local Juvenile Detention Centers, the Department of Youth Services shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county and multicounty juvenile detention centers. The Department of Youth Services may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated by the Department of Youth Services. The Department of Youth Services shall comply with the guidelines set forth in this section, accept and review applications, designate projects, and determine the amount of state match funding to be applied to each project. The department shall, with the advice of the county or counties participating in a project, determine the funded design capacity of the detention centers that are designated to receive funding. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in Chapter 153. of the Revised Code, the Department of Youth Services may coordinate, review, and monitor the drawdown and use of funds for the renovation and construction of projects for which designated funds are provided. (A) The Department of Youth Services shall develop a formula to determine the amount, if any, of state match that may be provided to a single county or multicounty detention center project. (B) The formula developed by the Department of Youth Services shall yield a percentage of state match ranging from zero to sixty percent. The funding authorized under this section that may be applied to a construction or renovation project shall not exceed the actual cost of the project. The funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to any project unless the detention center will be built in compliance with health, safety, and security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. In addition, the funding authorized under this section shall not be applied to the renovation of a detention center unless the renovation is for the purpose of increasing the number of beds in the center, or to meet health, safety, or security standards for detention centers as established by the Department of Youth Services. Section 384.10. 1 2 3 A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT B Reappropriations C Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) D C19507 Service Station Cleanup $2,000,000 E Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) Total $2,000,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $2,000,000 SERVICE STATION CLEANUP FUND (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipal corporation, township, port authority, or a county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code. (2) "Class C release" has the same meaning as in section 3737.87 of the Revised Code. (3) "Property assessment" means a property assessment conducted in accordance with section 3746.04 of the Revised Code or a corrective action process or source investigation process under rule 1301:7-9-13 of the Ohio Administrative Code. (4) "Property owner" means a political subdivision, an organization that owns publicly owned lands, or, with respect to land forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code, a county land reutilization corporation. (5) "Cleanup or remediation" means any action at a Class C release site to contain, remove, or dispose of petroleum or other hazardous substances or remove underground storage tanks used to store petroleum or other hazardous substances. (6) "Publicly owned lands" includes lands that are owned by an organization that has entered into a relevant agreement with a political subdivision and lands forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code. (B) The Abandoned Gas Station Cleanup Grant Program is established in the Department of Development for the purpose of cleanup and remediation of Class C release sites to provide for and enable the environmentally safe and productive reuse of publicly owned lands by the remediation or cleanup, or planning and assessment for that remediation or cleanup, of contamination or by addressing property conditions or circumstances that may be deleterious to public health and safety or the environment or that preclude or inhibit environmentally sound or economic reuse of the property as authorized by Ohio Constitution, Article VIII, Section 2o. Under this program, the Director of Development may do either or both of the following: (1) Award a grant of up to $100,000 to a property owner for purposes of a property assessment on a Class C release site; (2) Award a grant of up to $500,000 to a property owner for purposes of cleanup or remediation of a Class C release site. Grants under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section shall be used by a property owner to create a site that provides opportunities for economic impact through redevelopment. The Director of Development may consult with the Environmental Protection Agency, the State Fire Marshal, the Ohio Water Development Authority, and the Ohio Public Works Commission in connection with this program and the awarding of these grants. (C) A property owner applying for a grant under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall submit an application for the grant on a form prescribed by the Director of Development. An authorized representative of the property owner shall sign and submit an affidavit with the application certifying that the property owner did not cause or contribute to any prior release of petroleum or other hazardous substances on the site. Upon receipt of an application, the Director shall examine the application and all accompanying information to determine if the application is complete. If the Director determines that the application is not complete, the Director shall promptly notify the property owner that the application is not complete, provide a description of the information that is missing from the application, and return the application and all accompanying information to the property owner. The property owner may resubmit the application. If the Director approves an application under this section, the Director may enter into an agreement with the property owner to award a grant to the property owner. The agreement shall be executed prior to paying or disbursing any grant funds approved by the Director under this section. With respect to a grant awarded to a county land reutilization corporation for land that has been forfeited to the state under Chapter 5723. of the Revised Code, the agreement shall require that the land be transferred to the corporation prior to the payment or disbursement of the grant funds. Section 385.10. 1 2 3 A EXP EXPOSITIONS COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C72305 Facility Improvement and Modernization Plan $8,998,260 E C72312 Emergency Renovations and Equipment Replacement $765,956 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $9,764,216 G TOTAL ALL FUNDS $9,764,216 Section 387.10. 1 2 3 A FCC FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C230E3 Hazardous Substance Abatement $246,840 E C230E5 State Agency Planning and Assessment $113,317 F Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $360,157 G Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) H C23032 OHC - Ohio Historical Center Rehabilitation $5,000 I C23066 Variety Theater $85,000 J C230AB Cleveland Music Hall $400,000 K C230AE Variety Theatre $250,000 L C230AH Longtown Clemens Homestead $90,000 M C230BL Fairport Harbor Lighthouse Project $200,000 N C230BR Amherst Historical Water Tower Project $40,000 O C230BV Downtown Toledo Music Hall $400,000 P C230CH Mt. Perry Scenic Railroad Structure Renovations $125,000 Q C230CM Waverly Old Children's Home Renovation $20,000 R C230CN Garrettsville Buckeye Block Community Theater $227,323 S C230EC Triumph Of Flight $250,000 T C230FM Cultural And Sports Facilities Projects $42,214,368 U C230FS OHC - Ohio River Museum $5,000 V C230GJ OHC - Hopewell Ceremonial Earthworks $11,650,000 W C230J6 West Side Market Renovation $500,000 X C230R8 National Ceramic Museum and Heritage Center Renovation $100,000 Y C230X8 Riverside Veterans Memorial $15,000 Z C230Y6 Ashtabula Maritime and Surface Transportation Museum $100,000 AA C230Z8 Brooklyn John Frey Park $90,000 AB Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030) Total $56,766,691 AC Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) AD C23001 Public School Buildings $2,000,000 AE Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) Total $2,000,000 AF School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) AG C23002 School Building Program Assistance $380,000,000 AH School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) Total $380,000,000 AI TOTAL ALL FUNDS $439,126,848 OHC - OHIO RIVER MUSEUM The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230FS, OHC - Ohio River Museum, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C230W7, OHC - Lundy House Restoration. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, plus up to $9,294,558. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $8,907,561 from appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, and $386,997 from appropriation item C23010, Vocational Facilities Assistance Program. STATE AGENCY PLANNING/ASSESSMENT The foregoing appropriation item C230E5, State Agency Planning/Assessment, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide assistance to any state agency for assessment, capital planning, and maintenance management. Section 387.13. CULTURAL AND SPORTS FACILITIES PROJECTS The amount reappropriated from the foregoing appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2026. 1 2 A Project List B Dayton Dragons Improvements $2,000,000 C Columbus Symphony Orchestra $2,000,000 D Cincinnati Art Museum Improvements $1,650,000 E Louvee Theater $1,500,000 F Columbus Museum of Art Upgrades $1,250,000 G Jeep Museum $1,000,000 H Allen County Memorial Hall Improvements $1,000,000 I Playhouse Square $1,000,000 J Norwalk Theater Restoration $1,000,000 K Cleveland Museum of Art $1,000,000 L Greater Cleveland Foodbank $1,000,000 M Playhouse Square - Transformational Greyhound Project $1,000,000 N Severance Music Center $1,000,000 O Eric Mendelsohn Park Synagogue Campus Restoration $1,000,000 P Port Regal Theatre $1,000,000 Q Dayton Air Credit Union Ballpark $1,000,000 R A.B. Graham Memorial at I-70 and SR 72 $750,000 S Voice of America MetroPark & Museum Tylersville Road Grand Entrance $750,000 T Barn at Stratford Parking Lot Improvement and Expansion $657,000 U Central Presbyterian Church $650,000 V Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $600,000 W Dayton Art Institute Roof Replacement $600,000 X Ohio Aviation Hall of Fame $550,000 Y Harroun Barn Restoration/Preservation $500,000 Z Cleveland Public Theatre Improvements $500,000 AA Historic Washington Auditorium Project $500,000 AB Miami Valley Veterans Museum $500,000 AC Canton Township Palace Theater $500,000 AD Great Lakes Science Center - Water Technology Exhibition $500,000 AE Karamu House Capstone Capital Improvements $500,000 AF Museum of Contemporary Art Improvements $500,000 AG Central Presbyterian Church Renovation (CAPA) $500,000 AH Mansfield Theater Road to 100 Renovation $500,000 AI Day Air Credit Union Ballpark Professional Development License Facility Standard Improvements $500,000 AJ International Soap Box Derby $500,000 AK Columbus Museum of Art $350,000 AL Federal Valley Resource Center $350,000 AM Fort Laurens Restoration $330,000 AN Children's Museum of Cleveland $307,500 AO Rockwell District Cultural and Arts Amphitheater - Whitehall $300,000 AP Renovation of Wellman Theater $300,000 AQ Gloria Theatre and the Urbana Youth Center Improvements Champaign County YMCA $300,000 AR Willoughby Amphitheater $300,000 AS BAYarts Cultural Arts Center Expansion $288,000 AT Oak Harbor Riverfront $275,000 AU Piqua Arts - The Bank $250,000 AV Yoctangee Park Historic Armory $250,000 AW Canton Memorial Civic Center Improvements $250,000 AX Beck Center for the Arts $250,000 AY Northside's Outdoor Community Entertainment Venue $250,000 AZ Performing Arts Stage $200,000 BA Central Ohio Fire Museum Restoration $200,000 BB Cincinnati Regal Theater Renovation $200,000 BC Hollywood Theatre $200,000 BD East Liverpool Revitalization Project $200,000 BE Butler Institute of Art Studio Maker Space $200,000 BF Complete Cozad - Health Hospitality Campus $200,000 BG South Webster Historic City Hall Events Center & Museum $200,000 BH Canton Palace Theatre $200,000 BI St. Clairsville Train Depot $150,000 BJ Johnstown Amphitheater $150,000 BK Powell Education Center $150,000 BL Village of Richwood Opera House Restoration $150,000 BM Clearview Museum $150,000 BN Van Wert Area Performing Arts $150,000 BO Morgan County Historical Society $144,000 BP John and Iris Hathaway Education and Community Center $125,000 BQ Lorain County Historical Society $112,000 BR Outdoor Restroom Facility Construction $100,000 BS Wellston Sport Complex $100,000 BT Cleveland Majestic Hall $100,000 BU El Mercado at La Villa Hispana Cultural Revitalization $100,000 BV Levi Scofield Mansion Transformation $100,000 BW Old Town Hall $100,000 BX Dublin Arts Council - Muirfield Drive Project $100,000 BY Swanton Memorial Park Improvements $100,000 BZ Covedale Center - Phase 6 Renovations $100,000 CA West Liberty Town Hall Opera House Community Center Restoration and Renovation $100,000 CB Gant Stadium Renovation $100,000 CC Jacob Miller Tavern $100,000 CD Jacob Miller's Tavern Renovation $100,000 CE Circleville Historic City Hall Improvements $100,000 CF Middletown Entertainment and Sports Venue $100,000 CG Firelands Historical Society Expansion $100,000 CH Collingwood Arts Center Upgrades $100,000 CI Battle of Buffington Island Civil War Battlefield Museum $100,000 CJ Camden Opera House Second Floor Renovation $100,000 CK Swiss Community Historical Society - Heritage Center $100,000 CL The Music Settlement Center for Innovation, Education, and Technology $100,000 CM Polish Cultural Center $100,000 CN Historic Hoover Auditorium Renovation $100,000 CO Hotel McArthur $100,000 CP Rome Township Community Park $100,000 CQ Waterloo Arts Renovation Project $100,000 CR National Veterans Memorial and Museum Core Improvements $100,000 CS Cincinnati Observatory Improvements $100,000 CT Galion Big Four Depot Renovation $100,000 CU Start Westward Memorial $100,000 CV The Funk Music Hall of Fame and Exhibition Center $100,000 CW Twin City Opera House $100,000 CX Portage Riverwalk Arts Infrastructure - Oak Harbor $100,000 CY Barker House Stabilization Project $100,000 CZ The Mark at the Park Sponsors VIP Pavilion $95,000 DA Muirfield/Dublin Arts Project $75,000 DB Tarlton Community Building $75,000 DC Pleasant Square Community Center $75,000 DD Hune Covered Bridge Relocation $75,000 DE Heritage House Museum Restoration $75,000 DF Massillon Museum Improvements $75,000 DG Grant Presidential Sculpture $50,000 DH Clark Gable Facility Improvements $50,000 DI Wright Patterson Air Force Base Holocaust Museum $50,000 DJ John S. Knight Convention Center $50,000 DK Trumpet in the Land Outdoor Drama Tower Project $50,000 DL Decorative Arts Center of Ohio Accessibility Project $50,000 DM Grand Army of the Republic Hall $50,000 DN Canton Museum of Art $50,000 DO G.A.R. Hall Historic Rehabilitation $50,000 DP York Township Historical Society Museum and Educational Center $45,000 DQ Miami Valley Veterans Museum Upgrades $45,000 DR West Liberty Piatt Castle Mac-A-Cheek Improvements $44,000 DS Wendel Concert Stage $35,000 DT History of Weston, Historical Offerings $30,000 DU Village of Garrettsville Cemetery $25,000 DV Bucyrus Bicentennial Arch Project $25,000 DW Piketon Liberty Memorial $25,000 DX Dayton Contemporary Dance Arts and Cultural Center $25,000 DY Shelby House Museum $20,000 DZ Historic 19th Century Jefferson Depot Village $20,000 EA Muskingum County History (FKA Stone Academy) $15,668 EB Louisville Mainstreet $15,000 EC Paulding County Historical Electrical Wiring Project $14,500 ED Jackson Center Museum Building Improvements $13,500 EE Palmyra Township Historical Society $12,700 EF Jewish Community of Canton Technology Upgrades $10,000 EG Leipsic Recreation Center Improvements $7,500 EH Jeromesville Totem Pole $3,000 Section 387.15. HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE ABATEMENT IN STATE FACILITIES The foregoing appropriation item C230E3, Hazardous Substance Abatement, shall be used to fund the removal of asbestos, PCB, radon gas, and other contamination hazards from state facilities. Prior to the release of funds for asbestos abatement, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall review proposals from state agencies to use these funds for asbestos abatement projects based on criteria developed by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. Upon a determination by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission that the requesting agency cannot fund the asbestos abatement project or other toxic materials removal through existing capital and operating appropriations, the Commission may request the release of funds for such projects by the Controlling Board. State agencies intending to fund asbestos abatement or other toxic materials removal through existing capital and operating appropriations shall notify the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission of the nature and scope prior to commencing the project. Only agencies that have received appropriations for capital projects from the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) are eligible to receive funding from this item. Public school districts are not eligible. Section 387.20. SCHOOL BUILDING PROGRAM ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item C23002, School Building Program Assistance, shall be used by the Facilities Construction Commission to provide funding to school districts that receive conditional approval from the Commission pursuant to Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code. Section 391.10. 1 2 3 A JSC JUDICIARY SUPREME COURT B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C00502 General Building Renovations $5,000 E Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $5,000 F TOTAL ALL FUNDS $5,000 GENERAL BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations, plus up to $186,522. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, The Supreme Court shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $186,522 from appropriation item C00502, General Building Renovations. Section 393.10. 1 2 3 A PWC PUBLIC WORKS COMMISSION B Reappropriations C Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) D C15060 Clean Ohio Conservation $7,990 E C150AA Clean Ohio - District 1 $1,500,000 F C150BB Clean Ohio - District 2 $3,250,000 G C150CC Clean Ohio - District 3 $8,000,000 H C150DD Clean Ohio - District 4 $3,000,000 I C150EE Clean Ohio - District 5 $3,250,000 J C150FF Clean Ohio - District 6 $4,100,000 K C150GG Clean Ohio - District 7 $2,400,000 L C150HH Clean Ohio - District 8 $2,940,162 M C150II Clean Ohio - District 9 $2,500,000 N C150JJ Clean Ohio - District 10 $4,850,000 O C150KK Clean Ohio - District 11 $4,000,000 P C150LL Clean Ohio - District 12 $2,750,000 Q C150MM Clean Ohio - District 13 $5,000,000 R C150NN Clean Ohio - District 14 $3,450,000 S C150OO Clean Ohio - District 15 $3,000,000 T C150PP Clean Ohio - District 16 $2,500,000 U C150QQ Clean Ohio - District 17 $2,900,000 V C150RR Clean Ohio - District 18 $3,500,000 W C150SS Clean Ohio - District 19 $4,400,000 X Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) Total $67,298,152 Y State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Z C15000 Local Public Infrastructure $1,004,000 AA C15001 Infrastructure - District 1 $35,000,000 AB C15002 Infrastructure - District 2 $19,000,000 AC C15003 Infrastructure - District 3 $35,000,000 AD C15004 Infrastructure - District 4 $7,000,000 AE C15005 Infrastructure - District 5 $4,500,000 AF C15006 Infrastructure - District 6 $5,000,000 AG C15007 Infrastructure - District 7 $5,000,000 AH C15008 Infrastructure - District 8 $11,000,000 AI C15009 Infrastructure - District 9 $7,000,000 AJ C15010 Infrastructure - District 10 $15,000,000 AK C15011 Infrastructure - District 11 $11,500,000 AL C15012 Infrastructure - District 12 $5,000,000 AM C15013 Infrastructure - District 13 $4,000,000 AN C15014 Infrastructure - District 14 $4,000,000 AO C15015 Infrastructure - District 15 $5,000,000 AP C15016 Infrastructure - District 16 $6,000,000 AQ C15017 Infrastructure - District 17 $5,500,000 AR C15018 Infrastructure - District 18 $3,500,000 AS C15019 Infrastructure - District 19 $5,000,000 AT C15020 Emergency Set Aside $30,000,000 AU C15022 Ohio Small Government Capital Improvement $29,000,000 AV State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Total $253,004,000 AW State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) AX C150RA Revolving Loan - District 1 $15,000,000 AY C150RB Revolving Loan - District 2 $5,500,000 AZ C150RC Revolving Loan - District 3 $14,000,000 BA C150RD Revolving Loan - District 4 $5,000,000 BB C150RE Revolving Loan - District 5 $3,300,000 BC C150RF Revolving Loan - District 6 $6,500,000 BD C150RG Revolving Loan - District 7 $5,000,000 BE C150RH Revolving Loan - District 8 $4,750,000 BF C150RI Revolving Loan - District 9 $4,500,000 BG C150RJ Revolving Loan - District 10 $5,000,000 BH C150RK Revolving Loan - District 11 $45,000,000 BI C150RL Revolving Loan - District 12 $5,900,000 BJ C150RM Revolving Loan - District 13 $2,000,000 BK C150RN Revolving Loan - District 14 $5,000,000 BL C150RO Revolving Loan - District 15 $3,500,000 BM C150RP Revolving Loan - District 16 $4,000,000 BN C150RQ Revolving Loan - District 17 $4,500,000 BO C150RS Revolving Loan - District 18 $2,000,000 BP C150RT Revolving Loan - District 19 $2,600,000 BQ C150RU Small Government Program $4,000,000 BR C150RV Emergency Program $6,200,000 BS State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) Total $153,250,000 BT TOTAL ALL FUNDS $473,552,152 LOCAL PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE Capital reappropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. The Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that a need exists to appropriate investment earnings to be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Director of Budget and Management determines pursuant to division (D) of section 164.08 and section 164.12 of the Revised Code that investment earnings are available to support additional appropriations, such amounts are hereby appropriated. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP. REVOLVING LOAN Capital reappropriations in this act made from the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15030, Revolving Loan. CLEAN OHIO CONSERVATION GRANT REPAYMENTS Capital reappropriations in this act made from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.20 to 164.27 of the Revised Code. Any amount in grant repayments received by the Public Works Commission and deposited into the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund pursuant to section 164.261 of the Revised Code is hereby appropriated through the foregoing appropriation item C15060, Clean Ohio Conservation. Section 395.10. 1 2 3 A OSB DEAF AND BLIND EDUCATION SERVICES B Reappropriations C Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) D C22616 Renovations and Improvements $880,000 E C22624 Natatorium Renovations $757,620 F C22631 Campus Connector $2,112,248 G Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) Total $3,749,868 H TOTAL ALL FUNDS $3,749,868 RENOVATIONS AND IMPROVEMENTS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C22616, Renovations and Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2026, in appropriation item C22616, Renovations and Improvements, plus up to $292,345. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Deaf and Blind Education Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbered amounts up to $103,979 from appropriation item C22107, Renovations and Improvements, and $188,366 from appropriation item C22114, Dormitory Construction. Section 509.01. CERTIFICATION OF AVAILABILITY OF MONEYS Moneys that require release shall not be expended from any appropriation contained in this act without certification of the Director of Budget and Management that there are sufficient moneys in the state treasury in the fund from which the appropriation is made. Such certification made by the Office of Budget and Management shall be based on estimates of revenue, receipts, and expenses. Nothing in this section limits the authority of the Director of Budget and Management granted in section 126.07 of the Revised Code. Section 509.02. LIMITATION ON USE OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The appropriations made in this act, excluding those made from the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038) and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) for buildings or structures, including remodeling and renovations, are limited to: (A) Acquisition of real property or interests in real property; (B) Buildings and structures, which includes construction, demolition, complete heating and cooling, lighting, and lighting fixtures, and all necessary utilities, ventilating, plumbing, sprinkling, water and sewer systems, when such systems are authorized or necessary; (C) Architectural, engineering, and professional services expenses directly related to the projects; (D) Machinery that is necessary to the operation or function of the building or structure at the time of initial acquisition or construction; (E) Acquisition, development, and deployment of new computer systems, including the integration of existing and new computer systems, but excluding regular or ongoing maintenance or support agreements; (F) Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that meets all the following criteria: (1) Is essential in bringing the facility up to its intended use or is necessary for the functioning of the particular facility or project; (2) Has a unit cost of about $100 or more; and (3) Has a useful life of five years or more. Furniture, fixtures, or equipment that is not an integral part of or directly related to the basic purpose or function of a project for which moneys are appropriated shall not be paid for from these appropriations. This paragraph does not apply to appropriation items specifically for furniture, fixtures, or equipment. Section 509.03. CONTINGENCY RESERVE REQUIREMENT Any request for release of capital appropriations by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board for projects, the contracts for which are awarded by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, shall contain a contingency reserve, the amount of which shall be determined by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, for payment of unanticipated project expenses. Any amount deducted from the encumbrance for a contractor's contract as an assessment for liquidated damages shall be added to the encumbrance for the contingency reserve. Contingency reserve funds shall be used to pay costs resulting from unanticipated job conditions, to comply with rulings regarding building and other codes, to pay costs related to errors or omissions in contract documents, to pay costs associated with changes in the scope of work, and to pay the cost of settlements and judgments related to the project. Any funds remaining upon completion of a project, may, upon approval of the Controlling Board, be released for the use of the institution to which the appropriation was made for another capital facilities project or projects. Section 509.04. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENTS AND SETTLEMENTS AGAINST THE STATE Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appropriation contained in this act or in any other act may be used for the purpose of satisfying judgments, settlements, or administrative awards ordered or approved by the Court of Claims or by any other court of competent jurisdiction in connection with civil actions against the state. This authorization does not apply to appropriations that are to be applied to or used for payment of guarantees by or on behalf of the state or for payments under lease agreements relating to or debt service on bonds, notes, or other obligations of the state. Notwithstanding any other section of law to the contrary, this authorization includes appropriations from funds into which proceeds or direct obligations of the state are deposited only to the extent that the judgment, settlement, or administrative award is for or represents capital costs for which the appropriation may otherwise be used and is consistent with the purpose for which any related obligations were issued or entered into. Nothing contained in this section is intended to subject the state to suit in any forum in which it is not otherwise subject to suit, nor is it intended to waive or compromise any defense or right available to the state in any suit against it. Section 509.05. CAPITAL RELEASES BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Notwithstanding section 126.14 of the Revised Code, appropriations for appropriation items C50100, Local Jails, and C50101, Community-Based Correctional Facilities, appropriated from the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027) to the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, and any projects specifically identified for appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be released upon the written approval of the Director of Budget and Management. The appropriations from the Public School Building Fund (Fund 7021) and the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032) to the Facilities Construction Commission, from the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029) to the Department of Transportation, from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the State Capital Improvement Fund (Fund 7038), and the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) to the Public Works Commission, and from the Underground Parking Garage Operating Fund (Fund 2080) to the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board shall be released upon presentation of a request to release the funds, by the agency to which the appropriation has been made, to the Director of Budget and Management. Section 509.06. PREVAILING WAGE REQUIREMENT Except as provided in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code, moneys appropriated or reappropriated by the 136th General Assembly shall not be used for the construction of public improvements, as defined in section 4115.03 of the Revised Code, unless the mechanics, laborers, or workers engaged therein are paid the prevailing rate of wages prescribed in section 4115.04 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section affects the wages and salaries established for state employees under Chapter 124. of the Revised Code, or collective bargaining agreements entered into by the state under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, while engaged on force account work, nor does this section interfere with the use of inmate and patient labor by the state. Section 509.07. AUTHORIZATION OF THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT The Director of Budget and Management shall authorize both of the following: (A) The initial release of moneys for projects from the funds into which proceeds of direct obligations of the state are deposited; and (B) The expenditure or encumbrance of moneys from funds into which proceeds of direct obligations are deposited, only after determining to the Director's satisfaction that either of the following applies: (1) The application of such moneys to the particular project will not negatively affect any exclusion of the interest or interest equivalent on obligations issued to provide moneys to the particular fund from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (2) Moneys for the project will come from the proceeds of federally taxable obligations, the interest on which is not so excluded from the calculation of gross income for federal income tax purposes and which have been authorized and issued on that basis by their issuing authority. In the event the Director determines that the condition set forth in division (B)(1) of this section does not apply, and that there is no existing fund in the state treasury to enable compliance with the condition set forth in division (B)(2) of this section, the Director may create a fund in the state treasury for the purpose of receiving proceeds of federally taxable obligations. The Director may establish capital appropriation items in that taxable bond fund that correspond to the preexisting capital appropriation items in the associated tax-exempt bond fund. The Director also may transfer capital appropriations in whole or in part between the taxable and tax-exempt bond funds within a particular purpose for which the bonds have been authorized. Section 509.08. ACCOUNTING MAINTENANCE BY THE DIRECTOR OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the form and manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained in accordance with section 126.21 of the Revised Code. Section 509.11. REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO NON-STATE OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN FINANCED PROJECTS (A) No capital improvement appropriations or reappropriations made in this act shall be released for planning or for improvement, renovation, or construction or acquisition of capital facilities if a state agency, as defined in section 154.01 of the Revised Code, does not own the real property that constitutes the capital facilities or on which the capital facilities are or will be located unless provided for elsewhere in this act. This restriction does not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The state agency has a long-term (at least as long as the obligations that financed the project) lease of, or other interest (such as an easement) in, the real property. (2) In the case of an appropriation or reappropriation for capital facilities that, because of their unique nature or location, will be owned or be part of facilities owned by a separate nonprofit organization and made available to the state agency for its use or benefit, the nonprofit organization either owns or has a long-term (at least as long as the obligations that financed the project) lease of the real property or other capital facility to be improved, renovated, constructed, or acquired and has entered into a joint or cooperative use agreement, with and approved by the state agency that meets the requirements of division (B) of this section. (B) In the case of capital facilities referred to in division (A)(2) of this section, the joint or cooperative use agreement shall include, as a minimum, provisions that: (1) Specify the extent and nature of that joint or cooperative use, extending for not shorter than the length of the obligations that financed the project, with the value of such use or right to use to be, as determined by the parties and approved by the approving department, reasonably related to the amount of the appropriation; (2) Provide for pro rata reimbursement to the state should the arrangement for joint or cooperative use by a state agency be terminated; and (3) Provide that procedures to be followed during the capital improvement process will comply with appropriate applicable state statutes and rules, including the provisions of this act. (C) This section does not apply to appropriations or reappropriations from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003), the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100), or the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032). Section 509.12. REAPPROPRIATION OF UNEXPENDED ENCUMBERED BALANCES OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS (A)(1) Notwithstanding the original year of appropriation or encumbrance, the unexpended balance of a capital appropriation or reappropriation that a state agency has lawfully encumbered prior to the close of the fiscal year 2025-2026 capital biennium is hereby reappropriated for the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium from the fund from which it was originally appropriated or was reappropriated and shall be used only for the purpose of discharging the encumbrance. For those encumbered appropriations or reappropriations, any Controlling Board approval previously granted and referenced by the encumbering document remains in effect until the encumbrance is discharged or until the encumbrance expires at the end of the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium. (2) During the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium, the Director of Budget and Management may cancel an encumbrance that was reappropriated pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section if the Director determines that the encumbrance is no longer needed to complete the project for which it was reappropriated or appropriated. (B) If during the fiscal year 2027-2028 capital biennium, pursuant to section 126.22 of the Revised Code in order to correct an accounting error, the Director of Budget and Management reestablishes an encumbrance that was reappropriated pursuant to division (A) of this section, the amount representing the encumbrance canceled in error is reappropriated in accordance with division (A) of this section. Section 509.13. PREVIOUSLY RELEASED REAPPROPRIATIONS Capital reappropriations in this act that have been released by the Controlling Board or the Director of Budget and Management between July 1, 2024, and June 30, 2026, do not require further approval or release prior to being encumbered. Funds reappropriated in excess of such prior releases shall be released in accordance with applicable provisions of this act. Section 509.14. REAPPROPRIATION OF UNENCUMBERED BALANCES OF CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS The reappropriations made in this act represent the unencumbered balances of prior years' capital improvements appropriations estimated to be available on June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise specified, the actual unencumbered balances on June 30, 2026, for the appropriation items in this act identified as reappropriations are hereby reappropriated. Additionally, there is hereby reappropriated the actual unencumbered balances on June 30, 2026, of any appropriation items either appropriated or reappropriated in H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly or appropriated in S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly, H.B. 434 of the 136th General Assembly, H.B. 184 of the 136th General Assembly, or H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly, and not otherwise listed in this act, or created by the Controlling Board pursuant to section 127.15 of the Revised Code, if the Director of Budget and Management determines that such balances are needed to complete the projects for which they were reappropriated or appropriated. The appropriation items and amounts that are reappropriated by this act shall be reported to the Controlling Board within 30 days after the effective date of this section. Section 518.10. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 151. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations or reappropriations are made in this act from the Higher Education Improvement Taxable Fund (Fund 7024), the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031), the School Building Program Assistance Fund (Fund 7032), the Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034), the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038), the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040), the Coal Research and Development Fund (Fund 7046), the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056), the Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057), and the Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for natural resources, a statewide system of common schools, state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education, local subdivision capital improvement projects, coal research and development projects, and conservation purposes (under the Clean Ohio Program) and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 151. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 518.20. OBLIGATIONS ISSUED UNDER CHAPTER 154. OF THE REVISED CODE The capital improvements for which appropriations or reappropriations are made in this act from the Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016), the Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026), the Adult Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7027), the Juvenile Correctional Building Fund (Fund 7028), the Transportation Building Fund (Fund 7029), the Cultural and Sports Facilities Building Fund (Fund 7030), the Mental Health Facilities Improvement Fund (Fund 7033), and the Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035) are determined to be capital improvements and capital facilities for housing state agencies and branches of government, mental health and developmental disabilities, and parks and recreation and are designated as capital facilities to which proceeds of obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code are to be applied. Section 523.10. TRANSFER OF OPEN ENCUMBRANCES Upon the request of the agency to which a capital project appropriation item is appropriated, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer open encumbrance amounts between separate encumbrances for the project appropriation item to the extent that any reductions in encumbrances are agreed to by the contracting vendor and the agency. Section 525.10. LITIGATION PROCEEDS TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING FUND Except as otherwise required by section 109.112 of the Revised Code, any proceeds received by the state as the result of litigation or a settlement agreement related to any liability for the planning, design, engineering, construction, or constructed management of facilities operated by the Department of Administrative Services shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund or the Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0). Section 527.10. TRANSFERS FROM THE CLEAN OHIO REVITALIZATION FUND TO THE SERVICE STATION CLEANUP FUND During the biennium ending June 30, 2028, the Director of Budget and Management, at the request of the Director of Development, may transfer up to the remaining unobligated cash balance from the Clean Ohio Revitalization Fund (Fund 7003) to the Service Station Cleanup Fund (Fund 7100) as needed to provide for Service Station Cleanup grants awarded by the Director of Development. Section 529.10. REDUCTION OF DEBT AUTHORIZATION Amounts issuing authorities have been previously authorized to issue and sell in accordance with Article VIII of the Ohio Constitution shall be reduced by the total amounts transferred into their corresponding funds from the General Revenue Fund under Section 529.10 of H.B. 687 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 805.10. The items of law contained in this act, and their applications, are severable. If an item of law contained in this act, or if an application of an item of law contained in this act, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other items of law contained in this act and their applications that can be given effect without the invalid item or application.